I might be on the other side of the world, but if anything, I feel so removed from normal life here that lately, I’ve been making a conscious effort to stay better informed (e.g. watch the news, etc.). Unfortunately, here, dedicated news channels don’t really exist unless you have some fancy cable TV thing, and instead intersperse the news with soap operas, Dr. Phil (so much Dr. Phil!), and the like. More and more I’ve been realizing just how imperative it is to stay on top of the news, as it really does have an immediate effect on everyone, and can lend (or just as easily take away) credibility whenever you get in a serious conversation with people (think: my seminar class just yesterday).
I, I think, am a cross between the two. I find I have to write a scene if it’s nagging at me or has just come to me in a flash of inspiration, even if I’m not sure where it fits into the narrative. I can work this out later. This would put me in the ‘writer’ camp. But on the other hand, in order to work out why something has happened, I often find myself having to plan the plot out, so that I can see the progression of the storyline. I often make a list of character traits, which incidentally, was last weeks homework task, and this would put me in the ‘planner’ camp. So, just to be contrary, I think I am neither one nor the other. But at the end of the day, a writer has to do whatever works for them.
And this is somehow a good thing to support and take advantage of?
In between my physical labour, emotional doldrum, entertaining a few friends, essential jewelry crafting and compulsive crocheting, I make Earl Grey tea, with a splodge of milk...
Yet such is the agitation of these colors that it is apparent that Bruce had moved away from Matisse's tranquil world of calm and restful surfaces. Bruce had met Robert and Sonia Delaunay in the spring of 1912...
I personally have not seen the ad due to the fact that it was pulled from everywhere in creation before I could view it. So I’m kinda writing this blind so to speak. I’m just going to assume that there was some issue with chicken and the black community and what Madame Noire was referring to was that such an association was borderline stereotypical.
“We’re pleased to continue our relationship with the NFL and the NFLPA,” said Panini America CEO Mark Warsop. “The NFL and NFLPA are two of our most important licensors, and these new agreements will enable us to continue producing sought after products for NFL fans for years to come.”
It seems Rachel Cooke will always be the source of a raised eyebrow in my household, however. I remember back in 2004 reading one of her more "famous" articles. She interviewed the family of a missing woman in Texas in the US. Why? What was the news value for a UK audience? Oh, that's simple: the woman had the same name. Reporter Rachel in the UK says she searched for her own name on Google. It turned out another Rachel Cooke, in the US, was missing, presumed murdered. Our Rachel was so taken aback - never mind the news judgement - that she flew to Texas a few weeks later to report on her namesake. Journalists are still scratching their heads about this one. I say what a novel way to earn some more of that "good writer's" cash that she goes on about. Of course, no disrespect to the Texas family at the centre of that article; what's in question here is the UK reporter's motive for covering it.
I was born in 1950 to parents of Italian descent who were Catholic. As a child I was in awe of what happened at church every Sunday because the priest, who was dressed in robes and was surrounded by lit candles and incense, seemed to my boyhood mind like some special magician between the people, sitting in typical sheep-like fashion, and God.
I used my Gypsy and Cricut to design & create this project.
Then there’s Cecilia Alcott, England’s representative in the academy and a top contender when it comes to piloting an IS who suddenly sets her sights on Ichika in a negative way. Challenging the boy to an IS duel for the right to be Class President, it becomes clear that Ichika might not understand the fundamentals of what and IS is capable of but he has a natural talent for piloting one. Aside from that, his own personal IS – called the Byakushiki – is a powerful piece of hardware that shows its true setting during the duel with Cecilia.
Add unbeaten egg whites.
There is more to my story, but this is where I am stopping tonight. Short and sweet. End of chapter 1.
By a changing vison-
The Republican governor said signed the bill a day earlier, ending a multi-year effort to change state law. Lawmakers had passed repeals of the mandatory motorcycle helmet law before, but the measures were vetoed twice by then-Gov. Jennifer Granholm.
· The staff, though scarce, do care about the customer
The latest version numbers are:
“Love is eternal, sacred light…” (Paul Simon) I don’t know what else to do but open my heart to love and allow the love of life to flow into me, through me, out of me… to know and understand, to accept and forgive… It is hard. But life is worth the effort.
The Cycle Completes
Also, report identity theft to your local police department. If the crime occurred somewhere other than where you live, you may wish to report it to law enforcement there as well. The police will create an “identity theft report” and you can request a copy.
But Tam kenn'd (knew) what was what fu' brawlie (full well)
Still, these quibbles could be easily fixed with better signage (you have a blackboard, chalk the prices on it!) and when the staff get more experience.
12 tbsp softened
No; that it is too little.
Put up an 8qt pot of water and bring it to a boil with a little salt if you like
Oh sure, I would have liked to have kept Hammond's death scene from the book (although that may have traumatised younger viewers) and the CGI looks a little iffy nowadays, but I love Jurassic Park. Best moviegoing experience of 2011.
And a pre-view of tomorrow's post:
With that, they divided into two teams—taking turns kicking and clubbing. At one point, the men urinated on Kanhar, causing his open wounds to sting and burn. They broke his leg and placed a poisonous plant on his eyes to increase the pain.
She is organising a soap bubble activity in which one can experience how it was done last year in Sierra Leonne on May 6. Her motto: “Working together on individual events to make a positive influence for the future of us all”.
Then I took a shower, read a magazine, and passed-the-hell-out. And 24 hours later? My closet is still clean and organized. Yay for me!!
I finally got the hint. But I was devastated. I had lost something that I felt had so much potential. And it only lasted two months.
One completed, I printed them out onto heavy watercolour paper using my (Epson Stylus Photo 1400) desktop printer, trimmed them down using a sharp new xacto blade and metal ruler on a cutting mat, and rounded the corners using my corner rounder. Ready to go!
It was a gold lame' jacket, which I am pretty sure comes complete with it's own set of shoulder pads as well. I could wear it with the pink on pink shirt and look super classy.
Anything you are defensive about is an image! Observing your defenses is a great way to discover your false self-images. Nearly all of us are defensive about our bodies, our feelings, and our thoughts. They are, therefore, not our authentic selves. They are fake. The instant we identify with any image, thought, or feeling, we indulge in the fantasy of the falsely known self. We are not our bodies; we are not our thoughts; we are not our feelings. But while the body, thought, and feeling are not who you are, they are a part of you! It is a paradox.
Today is the 4th of July, the day that we Americans have set aside to celebrate our freedom as a nation. We all pull out the barbeque grills, stir up the baked beans and get together with family and friends. Children decorate their bicycles for neighborhood parades, and fireworks light up the evening skies. The beaches are crowded, and there is a waiting line at every ice cream stand. Freedom is good. Freedom is great. And we owe such a debt of gratitude to every man and woman who has served our nation, gaining our freedom, keeping our freedom. Not everyone has these rights, you know.
Special thanks to my travel-mate for her patience throughout the trip. My thanks to our coach driver, the attentive tour-manager and the knowledgeable tour-guides. I was grateful that our tour group had generally enjoyed good weather and great hospitality throughout our stay in Italy.
So then a few years later, I found another copy of the three paperback books, these ones themed after the movies. I got the set for $10. But because of the type of reader I am…. this seems to have happened:
The Giver is set in a future society which is at first presented as a utopia and gradually appears more and more dystopic, so could therefore be considered anti-utopian. The novel follows a boy named Jonas through the twelfth year of his life. Jonas’ society has eliminated pain and strife by converting to “Sameness”, a plan which has also eradicated emotional depth from their lives. Jonas is selected to inherit the position of “Receiver of Memory,” the person who stores all the memories of the time before Sameness, in case they are ever needed to aid in decisions that others lack the experience to make. As Jonas receives the memories from his predecessor—the “Giver”—he discovers how shallow his community’s life has become.
Author: Wikipedia: “David H. Keller (full name David Henry Keller; December 23, 1880–July 13, 1966) was a writer for pulp magazines in the mid-twentieth century who wrote science fiction, fantasy and horror. He was the first psychiatrist to write for the genre, and was most often published as David H. Keller, MD, but also known by the pseudonyms Monk Smith, Matthew Smith, Amy Worth, Henry Cecil, Cecilia Henry, and Jacobus Hubelaire.”… “Keller’s work often expressed strong right-wing views (Everett F. Bleiler claims he was “an ultra-conservative ideologically”), especially hostility to feminists and African-Americans.”
Getting into the final 10mins I set myself the task I getting as close to 18000m as possible. The first 20min set me up well but the middle 20min I had lost my way. So by the time the clock started to get close to 5min I had to start to get the numbers back under control. I started working into the 1.37's and final finished with a mid to low 1.30's. My heart rate climbed to 180 and with the heat in the garage climbing I was noticing just how bloody hot my body was. The distance I covered was 17931m, 1.40.3 split with av HR 164 and I can say it was such a mental challenge. When I got off the machine my ass was so sore and as I stood up it felt like I had a corked muscle. The hour is a significant test being able to race it takes it to a whole new level I am sure. For now I was happy to push to have the challenge and experience it. I would like to think next time I can go further by some way. The benchmark above by Eric Murray is a different activity with the dynamic ergo, but still doing 1.36's for an hour is huge.
Today we are looking at Acts 22:17.
I figure that if I complete them before any grandbaby births, I am in good shape :o)
By His grace, I have made spending time with Him a habitual practice over my years of being a Christian. My life is a living testimony that He fulfills His purposes through our lives when we make Him our highest Treasure. As we spend time with Him, He reveals to us the desires of His heart...and they become our own desires. He reveals to us His plans and purposes and then allows us to walk in them. The great and mighty One accomplishes His will through our weak and broken lives simply because we lay ourselves before Him day after day.
I think I either ovulated yesterday or today. I've had weird symptoms that I think I can attribute to a rise in progesterone - very mild PMS-like symptoms. I also had a positive OPK 2 days ago and saw a slight increase on my BBT chart. So now another two-week wait begins. I gave the HPT's to DH and asked him to hide them from me until the 26th, but I think that may still be too early, since I ovulated later than I expected.
At the very least, the people living in the former Communist countries knew and admitted that they were taking part in a gigantic social experiment, and that the media and the authorities were serving them propaganda to shore up support for this project. Yet in the supposedly free West, we are taking part in a gigantic social experiment of Multiculturalism and Muslim immigration every bit as radical, utopian and potentially dangerous as Communism, seeking to transform our entire society from top to bottom, and still we refuse to even acknowledge that this is going on.
“In my opinion this is very necessary to balance the rising cost of inflation and bodily injury claims and I think it will percolate through to commercial,” he said.
With all of that being said, I'm thankful for the painful memories just as I am thankful for the happy memories. I am thankful for every piece of the puzzle that has led us to where we are and will lead us where we are going. I am finding peace and gratitude in knowing that our journey may not look like someone else's, but that doesn't make it any less beautiful.
Let us begin at the beginning, the Making of Revolutionary Terrorist Rebels.
This is one of the tougher firing buttons that I deal with on a regular basis, only firing off a shot at the aliens maybe 50% of the time. It takes some getting used to. The controls almost always fuck up when you're trying to enter your name in the high score list, so you end up entering the wrong initials, not that it matters because the list resets it's self every night anyway, but still... fuck.
In 1943, the British Army cancelled its plans for an offense into Burma. Wingate convinced Wavell to let him take his small force deep into Burma to disrupt Japanese supplies and divert Japanese troops. The goal was to forestall a Japanese offensive against India.
If You want to hear me speak and share more then Vote at http://j.mp/I0hHXN #makethestage @internetweek.look for " This Ain’t Your Mama’s Dress Shop A How to Fashion Tech Guide for Designers!" Register and press that thumbs up button EVEN IF WE ARE AT THE TOP! every vote counts and we want to share our knowledge!
I noticed that had started budding new shoots out of the ground already. So I decided to take the plunge, and dig it up! The roots spread in three feet in all directions. I had to trim it back, I hope the root pruning doesn't make it too unhappy. Also, some of those roots had budded, so I've planted them along the side of the greenhouse in the hopes that they also grow. We'll see. I just hope I didn't kill it!
"Criminal record checks are done in an inconsistent manner across departments.
It seems that she covered for him, and continued to tell her family that he was "the love of her life" even when he was regularly beating her. Why would she do that?
I just finished up a beautiful $1.75 million home in beautiful Los Gatos, California. I thought I would share the pictures with you.
-Maybe she has passed away …Dear Lord, please no!
Thank you for the clarification but I don’t think this resolves the tension created by this verse. If those bodies are on earth after the resurrection and the holy ones rule from earth forever, how is it then that the body from heaven is EVERLASTING IN the heavens? Both of these words together create a problem I believe for that understanding, because they cannot be everlasting in the heavens if they are everlastingly living on earth.
juridically integrates the many customary laws of its ethnic groups.
In 1959, Cline met Randy Hughes, who became her manager. With Hughes’s promotion and a new label, Cline would begin her ascent to the top. When her Four Star contract expired in 1960, she signed with Decca Records-Nashville, under the direction of legendary producer Owen Bradley. He was not only responsible for much of the success behind Cline’s recording career, but he positively influenced the careers of Brenda Lee and Loretta Lynn as well.
In any case, Lunghu doesn’t see this as merely another internal bureaucratic naval battle between the Silent Service (Vysotsky) and the Tincan Sailors (Chirkov). Was a blue Honda somehow involved?
When Black Friday falls you know it's got to be
To Jessica, the love and light of my life.
Any container chosen must have a bottom hole for adequate drainage. Place containers on legs, bricks, coasters, or saucers to allow drainage and to protect the surface underneath.
Charles Pecqueur has decorated the garden of his house with frescoes and sculptures, representing Popey, Lafontaine's fable of the hare and the tortoise, and the story of Snow White.
The fashion world is torn about the V Size Issue with many calling it a gimmick to up readership. The reality of the debate is that the spreads are, largely just as stunning and interesting as normal V spreads. One particular spread pits plus size star model Crystal Renn posing in similar ways and wearing the same outfit as new runway standout Jacquelyn Jablonski. It must be noted that Renn appears vivacious, sultry, and truly like a seasoned model in Proenza Schouler. Yet despite Renn's obvious advantage the spread still comes off as condescending and gimmicky.
Like most Americans I usually don't follow through on things that I start doing. This weekend I followed through on the commitment that I made in July to walk the Komen 3 Day. Not only did I train for this event, but I raised more than $2300 to help find a cure for breast cancer. Then I followed up by walking 60 miles in 3 days!
- 2 celery stalks, chopped
we're doing it.
One of the three core technologies is around distance learning. This is necessary to eliminate the need for travel, room and board - all major current costs. This also increases starting and ending time flexibility. Finally, it allows some students to get MBA’s while also holding jobs and being productive in their family and community.
If you have not done your research or not read the job description properly, your interviewer will be able to tell. Should you get the company or interviewers name wrong that probably won’t help your cause too much, unless of course the interviewer is forgiving and appreciates that such a slip is probably down to nerves.
“No, you are not at all, sir. Do be pleased to enter,” Brulee said, gesturing to the small open space in front of the door.
The boy toddled off to bed, leaving his poor father a jangled ball of nerves on the living room floor.
Garcia, Jerry, Charles Reich, and Jann Wenner. Garcia: A Signpost to New Space.
sigh when flood was averted
And speaking of hoping...have you heard about the fun MilSpouse Appreciation Day Blog Hop being sponsored, starting this Friday, by the lovely ladies at Riding the Roller Coaster and Household 6 Diva? This Friday is MilSpouse Appreciation Day and the hop starts at noon! It is going to be a great way to discover and read new MilSpouse blogs and hopefully meet some new friends! For the rules of the hop and how to get linked up, stop by Riding the Roller Coaster or clicking on the link below.
He kept on going higher and higher. In Genesis 40 v 43 the Bible tells us about Jacob, how he increased exceedingly and then we can give you several other examples but because of time, we all know that when we say something is rising, it means it is getting better, it’s shining brighter, it’s becoming more and more known.
I've thoroughly enjoyed indie publishing. I've designed the cover and the interior. I've done all the editing. I've done all the marketing.
And she ends with this:
Natalie: Is it hard being married to a military man mommy?
5. How tidy are you?
What is the point of carrying a gun publicly? That is why we hire Police to protect our streets. Residents don’t need to Man their own roads and protect the general public.
Then since I had free time and paper and pencils out, I decided to draw a pirate map. Now this I really had fun with!
Fay’s Note: “sôda-sui” (bubbled/carbonated water) is a summer kigo.
The stock market topped in October of 2007 and began a downward decline into 2008. The U.S. economy slipped into recession as the construction industry stalled along with the housing market. Unemployment started rising and kept rising. People, ever so subtly, began to restrain themselves from borrowing more money.
Chuck: I don't know.
However, after thinking about it, I came up with a solution that ought to make everybody as happy as rats in a cheese factory. It’s amazing what you can accomplish by simply giving people what they want.
Nate will be 12 next month. He is damn near a teenager...fuck I feel old.
I’m just sayin’, y’know, we have the option, were.
Growing up, yes. Tell myself just another day, yes. But do I want it to be just another day? No. I want it to be my day, I want to be around people who don’t even have to try to make it fun for me, them being there does it. I want to be around people who accept me for all that I am, the way I am, and it’s easy to be me around them too.
Bottom Line: On one hand, it's a lovely romance about two characters who truly love and respect each other, and on the other hand it's gritty historical fiction with a lot of violence. It's interesting to see these two worlds meet.
1) Boil potato until tender.
The police vehicle pulled over to allow the Golf to pass, but "at that moment the driver of the Mazda could not pull over as he was passing a truck".
Drug Metabolism and Exercise
In verses 20-23… Potiphar places Joseph in prison… Because the Lord was with him, Joseph prospered in prison… He was made overseer… the prisoners were under Joseph’s control… God will give you His Divine protection even when you are in dangerous places. During my time of service in WWII, the Lord favored me with Divine protection… His hand was upon me, literally. In one action, an enemy shell exploded in front of me, and the soldier who was with me saw a great big white hand pull me down. When I got up, my rifle and machine gun were demolished but I was unharmed… The soldier just kept staring at me. He told others… God can prosper and protect you even when you are in bad situations. Believe it… I know… We are living in perilous times… The Lord wants to be with you in times like these. Joseph had a heart for God… He took God seriously… and God prospered him… Are you a blessing in your workplace?… The Lord can show you mercy and give you favor just as he did for Joseph (Genesis 39:21).
Beatings
The store had only two customers when the Sapphire went missing – a Mrs. Thompson and a Mr. Ortega. Thompson is looking for aquamarine necklaces where as Ortega is looking for a suitable gift for his wife and requests to see some uncut stones. The clerk, on his way back to show Ortega the gems, trips over and spills a lot of stones on the carpeted floor and the stones are quickly retrieved by the store employees. But one valuable stone is found missing. The big Sapphire which would stand out on the dark carpet is nowhere to be found in the edgeless circular room. Both the customers are searched thoroughly and they are let go only after confirming that they didn’t have the stone on them or on their clothes. The only clue turns out to be a discarded bubble gum wrapper – but no one was chewing any gum nor was any gum found anywhere in the store.
Want more chances to win make an additional entry for each of the following.
It was my fault the robbers broke into our apartment that chilly day in March.
The top of the hat is a bow made of knitted cords. It was a fun and fast project (which is why I prefer knitting for babies rahter than adults - much faster to finish:).
This was our last weekend with a baby. Next weekend she will be a toddler! She is such a little joy to my life and I love my girl to bits. Her hair is getting so long so please excuse how ratty it looks. She needs it in a ponytail or pigtails at this point!
When the slow motion, elitist-manipulated mob action known as our faux democratic/consumerist culture deprives people of their basic human rights and personal dignity — then, in turn, we should not be shocked when a mob of the underclass fails to bestow those virtues upon others.
To a chicken grower, for example, the relevant market isn’t restaurants or household consumers of chicken, it’s the market of chicken processors. Through a variety of machinations, including long-term contracts and the physical placement of processing plants (think baseball, before free agency), chicken growers now routinely have a market of only one processor to sell to.
The common denominator to these three classic concerts is that the star of the show is no longer alive, or the associated act has no chance of ever playing together. Also, it would be preferable to include some type of live performance accompaniment to enhance the show.
We decided to head a little early to the airport so that Jordy could watch the aeroplanes. We ended up going through security and heading upstairs to watch them take off, which Darcy enjoyed as well.
#5 That my son went to bed "early" tonight!! 8pm and he was out! :)
Green chillies - 2 slit lengthwise
When I heard that, something in my mind clicked. The ‘Oh My God’ moment became so clear in my mind. I have done everything that I can to make us work. Even on D-Day itself, I had blindly said the F word to my husband, the “I Forgive You” that is. From that moment until now, I have done so much, turned myself inside out especially since our reconciliation. I have cried, I have cared, I have ignored, I have bargained, I have plead, I have yelled (out loud and in my head), I have debated, I have loved as much as one can possibly love, I have forgiven, I have felt sorry for myself, I have feared for the worst. I have even gave birth to our first child. But one important thing that I haven’t done is to Surrender. Not to give up, but Surrender to what Life has planned for me. In my case, Surrender to our future together, any future; either a good one or a not so good one. I fully realized that I need to have complete faith so I can now live my life with confidence and free of fear, that maybe the worst is now over.
Step 1... Create your frame. Instead of doing a traditional circle hoop for the mobile, I wanted it to be the shape of a playing card. We used the dimensions from a real card and multiplied it until we had the size we wanted. My darling husband put the frame together for me (thank you, Sweetheart!)
In a milestone measure undertaken by Ministry of Railways for the benefit of rail users, a comprehensive Indian Railway Web Portal with the URL www.indianrailways.gov.in has been launched with a view to consolidate all the services and information onto a single window web-interface for the public. This comprehensive omnibus single window web interface will be for the entire Rail User community of India whether they are Passenger Service, Freight Service or Parcel Service Customers.
Both skirts are comfy and have pockets to put my honey stingers into, both have the nice little built in shorts/bun huggers, both are silky soft, and both are bright. This is love.
What is happening to the Russians this year is a repeat of what happen in City Council redistricting in 2003. In 2001 CM Domenic M. Recchia won in a race that saw 5 Jewish candidate spit the vote in a Brighton Beach council district. In order to win the seat in 2003 Recchia got the redistricting committee to cut out about a third of the Russian vote from his district. Dr. Gutnick who wanted to run for the council assembled a team of lawyers and redistricting experts to complain to the Justice Department. His effort failed because the Russians were not a protected class under the Voting Rights Act. Recchia who the Russians called the Butcher of Brighton after he cut up their district in 2003 was one of the first to endorse Fidler for State Senate. Most of Brooklyn's Russians were treated in the Soviet Union as second class citizens because Jewish. In New York they are also not treated as equals by the political elite. It is not only Brooklyn that the Russians are divided. The Russian community in Queens currently located in Hevesi district is expected to be divided into six different districts. * IT'S ALL ABOUT RECCHIA! THE VOTERS HAVE NO CHOICE
Preparation: 10 minutes, 12–24 hours in advance
If you haven't checked out this beautiful book, it's FULL of page after page of inspiring rooms. The collaborations with her builder/designer husband, are showcased throughout. The two work as a pair, complementing each other's eye for detail and precision.
o Media/ public outreach coordinator
May 9
Let me give you the whole story…
Wherever I am at lilac time.. I long for home.
During the first few weeks of the season, everyone has too much fun projecting Opening Day home runs into 162-home run seasons, and watching batting averages like .917 or .083 accompany at-bats.** It’s fun– and to my mind is at the core of being a sports fan– to dream about an incredible 162-home run season. It’s just as fun to see a wacky batting average above .900, since we know that Opening Day dinger may be the only one some players hit until the All-Star break, and we know that .917 batting average will eventually come closer to .300. They are greater than our expectations.
I called my gym (which has odd hours sometimes) to make sure they were open on Monday. 'Oh, we're open,' the woman said, 'all the gyms are open today. And packed.'
I am also pleased as punch to be able to offer a giveaway of a copy of Elizabeth's new cookbook to one of my Crispy Cook readers. To enter this giveaway, leave a comment below telling me about something great and gluten-free that you have recently made. You can get a second entry in this giveaway by stopping by the new Crispy Cook facebook page and liking it and then telling me that you did so in another comment. I will pick a random winner after the deadline of March 21, 2012, midnight Eastern Standard Time. This giveaway is limited to U.S. residents.
But, my faith is not there. I try, but nothing comes to me.
A coincidence it may have been, but Ben couldn't be sure. As soon as his ticket appeared at the flashing slot below all the buttons, the rising sound of the next train began to fill the station. Solemn smirked and dug his hands into his jeans. 'Love it!'
“Canst hear,” said one, “the breakers roar?
Not only do these souffles look impressive, they taste wonderful. They are tangy from the Parmesan, with those delicious ribbons of spinach running throughout, and the eggs form a lovely crust on top while being almost impossibly soft inside. I was thrilled with my first souffles, and I do hope you'll give them a try, too. They are so much easier than you think they are!
I’m in London, UK and he .. he is in Wisconsin, USA.
Today's bento is again without any cute characters because I wanted to make something simpler and I wanted to use the Farfalle pasta which I just bought yesterday.
The most powerful creative people in the television industry tend to be show creators and/or showrunners (i.e., the executive producers in charge on a day to day basis), but only 21 percent of the creators and 23 percent of the executive producers in the 2008-‘09 season were women, according to the Center (the summary of the 2008-‘09 report is here).
Does that make him a slave to it? Aggra’s approach seems to be likening Thrall’s desire to see his people safe and peaceful to forced servitude. I suppose her alternative would be to have Thrall slough off his duties there and do what he pleases. I’m sorry, but heroes do not do as they please — they’re heroes because they do what is necessary. Often, that means sacrifice. And often, that means they are alone and yes, even unhappy, but they continue on because they know they are the man or woman for the job, and what they’re doing is right. They stand out, because the easy thing to do — what many average, sensible people would do — is to look out only for themselves and those very close to them, no one else.
Lastly, the film was made in cooperation with the surviving family members of those aboard Flight 93 who were able to provide personal details about the passengers. In fact, proceeds from United 93's theatrical run were donated to funding a memorial near Shanksville, Pennsylvania.
(click on the poster for full size)
Check out her hair!! Seriously. How cool is this bride? This was one of the first weddings I truly loved when I discovered wedding blogs a couple of years ago. It was featured on Rock n Roll Bride and introduced me to the AMAZING work of Chloé Browne at Caught The Light.
Just as with the other cases I’ve outlined here, there is a mega-lie at the centre of this one. The difference this time is that, as the case still lies in the future, nobody is certain whether the mendacity lies with DSK or the NYPD. For me, they both fit the frame – very powerful and convinced of immunity from prosecution – so it’s anyone’s guess. But it promises to be fun finding out.
He grabbed my hand again and held it tightly while he climaxed. I was so fucking turned on and I came shortly after. We both moaned really quietly, together, and then we started to giggle.
Stamps: On Your Birthday, Sweet Stems
The key is not to take it personally. I said it wasn't easy. If someone rejects your idea or pitch, it might just be that it's not right for them on that day. Perhaps you haven't angled it quite right for that publication. Perhaps it's just, gulp, a crappy idea. We all have them. Even if we don't like to admit it. They're not rejecting you as a person, just that particular idea, pitch, feature or proposal.
My dreams have been sculpted by the spirit of others
I can feel these lyrics reverberate within me. The joy of the sacred walk is inexplicable. Striving to attain something higher and purer is lovelier than any pleasure for me. The path is as beautiful as the destination, even when I stumble and fall down. I cannot imagine living any other way.
And we all know that, despite great political difficulties and the inevitable compromises that practical politics require, Reagan managed to translate his words into deeds time and time again. So just one small example of that may suffice. As Thomas Sowell put it:
“Ah yeah… Bruce Lee Right… Be Like Water…” The Detective smiled, and walked away.
20. Rocky Mountain Way (Joe Walsh song)
Shakespeare in Love (Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard)
Hello, everybody! I hope your holidays were joyful and that 2012 is off to a great start. I'm popping in with a quick post today to give you an update regarding the shop and to share a few photos. China Pheonix 2 is well on her way out of the ashes at this point and Nancy says if everything goes according to plan, we may see a grand reopening in early February. This is exciting news!
DW: First, then, do you believe that Israel is tied in with this cabal you keep mentioning, in some way?
the stock mingle the flavor each other.
The prize winners of last weeks’ challenge are:
Today, via the guys in the brown shorts I received, the slickest pair of the new Kinvara 3 (not even available in the country yet!). For a guy like me, that’s like a 550 NIS gift that I will use to the utmost. So, thanks Saucony, I’m really grateful. I might even try them in the 10k next week.
Mater amta intemerata
“The shaded area contains the decades we are studying 1960-2010, when the percentage of nonmarital births rose steeply throughout. But before that, hardly anything had changed since the first numbers were collected in 1917. Studies of the white family in earlier eras indicate that the line hugging the bottom of the graph 1917 to 1960 would have been flat all the way back to the Revolution. White children were conceived outside marriage at varying rates in different social classes, but hardly ever born outside marriage in any class.”
We were truly, utterly, awed and amazed. He knew a word. He recognized language. In that moment, we remembered his undeniable baby genius status. We didn't care if other people's babies had been reciting Shakespeare soliloquies since they were 6 weeks old. Our baby knows the word clap. He hears it, he does it. Completely, utterly brilliant.
13 Green Eyed Lady 3:35
So happy birthday, Evan. Hope your 15th is your best birthday EVER!
And on the wet grey day that today has turned out to be I enjoyed playing around creating a seasonal background for them with our pumpkins waiting to be carved and a few faded blooms from the drippy garden............
No cupcake liners are used in this recipe, just a greasing of butter and a dusting of cocoa powder "flour". Now when the directions say butter, do not try to take a shortcut and spray the tins with cooking spray. Once you dust the tins with cocoa powder, you will end up with a gooey, chocolate-y mess. Trust me on this one. Properly prepared tins should look like the one above.
Control structures
29. Cry, the Beloved Country - Alan Paton
i am a relatively healthy person
I also don’t know about you, but my past was really awesome, in a 17 year old kind of way. I looked back at the things I said and I wouldn’t take them back for the world. I was a bold little boy. Now I’m old and I can’t talk about the same things anymore. I still do, but that is why I have no friends.
I see myself as one who has learned another great lesson by paying attention.
Coming to us from Belgium, Stella Artois is a very typical North and Western European Lager. It has many similarities to Heineken, Becks, Carlsberg etc. I have this feeling that all Lagers that come in a green bottle have the same sort of skunkiness to its taste.
Look at all of them hard at work (I mean play!) We had cardmakers, scrapbookers and even those working on altered art projects (that would be me, however I also did some of my granddaughter's scrapbook) That is my empty chair and table space but I was busy taking a few photos! I finished that project I was working on.... to be photographed and shared at a later day (But soon and I'm so excited!)
It is not expected that detailed blogposts will be brought to you on proceedings in this case because NAMA is really peripheral to the case and the main focus appears to be set on alleging conspiracy, bad faith, breach of implied partnership rules and suchlike, but an eye will be kept on it for developments which might affect NAMA’s biggest single transaction to date. It’s a pity because it looks set to be a titanic clash involving ego, money (and lot’s of it), power and reputation.
but two other lives were saved
No matter how long or short
They fight us with Judaism, so we should fight them with Islam. They fight us with the Torah, so we should fight them with the Koran. If they say “the Temple,” we should say “the Al-Aqsa Mosque.” If they say: “We glorify the Sabbath,” we should say: “We glorify the Friday.” This is how it should be. Religion must lead the war. This is the only way we can win.
Just 20 percent are life-only contracts that offer no guarantee period at all. A lot of quotes go out with the 10-year period certain option included, Baker notes. “That option is popular because it removes the behavioral barrier to purchase—that is, the concern that if the person buys a product without that option and then dies soon after, the estate will get none of the money.”
my cute black jacket from H&M disappeared from out of the huge pile of our stuff at the Vic. I do not understand how. Even separating it from the pile would have required digging around and choosing not to bother with wallets or real coats. So that’s sad. But maybe the universe will return it to me. Sometimes that happens.
You're looking at the sum total of my current working space, a square metre or so of territory that I grudgingly share with my wife Yoko and, occasionally, with my six-year-old daughter Cocoa. I've been using it since about 2006, and the limited space does have its benefits - sometimes I feel like I'm a cramped X-Wing pilot, dodging the wide world and distractions around me. The kitchenette is just behind (to my left) and the TV and stereo are just to my right. The three of us share an apartment that is thirty-three square metres in size, so
Cazzy: I used the Japanese scene and Japanese pack from Squigglefly and I managed to get the screen in there too. My little old lady is about to put up another lantern to celebrate. All the visitors have politely taken off their sandals and left them outside.
XL: “I hope that by then I was able to establish Xtatic Line as a household name and had built something special enough to be remembered for a long time.”
So easy a kid could do it!
This is a classic I remember from the old days, meaning my youth when cooks in the kitchen had a soulful vibe going on in creating dishes (foods) not only for our enjoyment but theirs as well. Oh yeah, now they new how to cook. In our household, on occasion, we were entertained with Emma Lee, daughter of Annie Bell who was my grandmother's permanent kitchen entertainer. I use the word 'entertainer' because never did a day go by that a funny, entertaining fiasco occur. Emma Lee enjoyed acting up to the more modern likes of Redd Foxx or George Kirby and singing Marvin Gaye while Annie Bell was happy gyrated to the tunes of Etta James and James Brown, all while frying some of the best crusted chicken I have ever known. She is the one who taught me how to cook Green Beans and New Potatoes along with so many other tricks in southern cookery. And not only could she sing, she could shake a tail-feather too. Now all this went on mind you while we young'uns were 'helping out' and while the elders were off doing, well their elderly things. And if things got broken while 'helping out', well, we of course took the blame even though never was that believable.
Here they are outside in the flower garden. They look pretty happy, don't they?
I am a bit of a grinch this year. I am just calling a spade a spade. I am not in the mood to decorate. I don't want to go to parties or shop for presents. If I could skip it all together I would, but I have a six year old who keeps asking where the tree is. I tried to pay her to NOT put up decorations, but she has yet to learn the value of bribery or a $20 bill. This time last year, I blogged about how Thomas' illness had helped me focus on the true meaning of Christmas and to forget about the fluff. You can read my thoughts last year here. As I was driving home tonight, I was thinking about all the things about Christmas that get on my nerves. I know. You each wish you were in the car with me to hear the running commentary.
Peel and grate the wasabi root on shark skin rasp. Make a paste with the root.
* 3 stalks of celery
with which you fit together
Yes. Well said. No need for me to embellish that.
Saute the Mushrooms
The word-banning habit has a happy home at the UK Independent, where John Rentoul keeps a regularly updated “Banned List” of clichés and neologisms that elicit his scorn – enough to publish a book of them. He has banned hundreds of expressions, including debut (v.), feral, fast-forward, inclusive, project, ahead of, a sense of, upcoming, ongoing (wahey!), serves to, lifestyle, and figurative sleepwalking.
The much anticipated Sex and the City 2 movie has finally opened with lots of promotion and press as one might expect. I haven't seen it yet (have you?), but I've naturally been very interested in the look and feel of the movie. Based on the movie trailers and still photography that's floating around - we can definitely say that this movie is filled with color and texture. The TV series and first movie were more about the clothes, but this one seems much more about the (dare I say it?) surroundings. As Carrie says in the movie "I've been cheating on fashion with furniture". Music to our ears! Lots of other blogs and sites have been covering the interior design of this new movie, including lots of resources, so I'll post a link to those sites at the bottom. However, I thought it would be interesting to compare the evolution of the interior design from television series through the two movies. Since much of the creative team is the same, it makes for an interesting exercise, I think.
Military Dictators?
Yes, that’s exactly what they do. Really? Oh.
The Games Day Captain (once he arrives from across the pond) will mark the return of an old friend, I actually owned the miniature back in '91, although as I recall I picked it up at the opening of the Luton Games Workshop; but my memories getting a little unreliable these days and I could be mistaken, I don't seem to remember ever owning a droid either...
Arrived home after a long day, grabbed the mail, and headed into the house. Opened a bill found in the aforementioned mail only to see....
Indie Gay & Lesbian
OK - now you might be wondering why I thought this was challenging dough. It was warm and humid down here when I baked and whenever I had the dough out of the freezer for more than a minute, it got gummy and completely unable to handle. If I used virtually frozen dough, it handled BEAUTIFULLY. When I do these next year, I've made a note to myself to divide the dough into thirds for easier handling, and work straight from the freezer, rotating the pans. Re-rolling is no problem because you are rolling between parchment sheets and not adding flour over and over, which is problematic when re-rolling sugar cookies. I used every last bit of dough!
It is time to go and visit with Patrice on her porch. This is how the porch looks in the early morning. I am able to sit out here when it is cold because it is protected. If you were able to come and visit we would sit here and have tea.
Date #2 was sushi, my fav cuisine. Unfortunately the sushi was super gross. Like warm enough to crawl off the table before my chopsticks could pick it up. Then Parker laid it on me, Ella, I have a confession... Oh great. This should be good. What’s this guy got? A kid? A contagious disease? A warrant for his arrest? I’ve seen it all, not much can surprise me anymore. I’m not a student at your university. Okay, kinda creepy considering we discussed majors and the President D’s lack of humility, but that’s not too bad.
It is very simple: while sitting comfortably just relax and close your eyes so your brain is less active. Touch the center of your chest with one or two fingers at the level of your armpits to bring your awareness to your heart. Smile freely to your heart and follow your feeling without thinking how to do so. The best attitude is to not expect anything.
We surfaced at Station 161, and emerged into the merchandise, the bars and the swarming army of blue and white Yankee fans. Tigers fans were rare, but certainly not endangered. The atmosphere was relaxed and friendly, more like an Australian cricket crowd than an English football crowd.
Mike Collett , football editor for news service Reuters, wrote on his blog yesterday that he was threatened by two policemen who demanded bribes in foreign currency.
They sell for something like 1800 yen each, but I was able to get them both together for something like 2000 yen off yahoo.jp
Winner announced on Tuesday April 20, 2010.
OK, so I know I'm a day late, but I really wanted to do this link-up all the same...
There's been two trial runs on making zippered purses/pouches for the Mouthy Stitches Swap. The first one, the zip was just that little bit too long. I followed a tutorial which was fairly good in general but I had a couple of problems with it, and there are definitely things I would change if I used that tutorial again. I also put a pocket inside this one too.
I’m also not convinced that Apple will be able to deliver a groundbreaking display technology that will want us to ditch our current high-end televisions. Yes, Apple has been able to do special things in the past, but the television market isn’t computers or smartphones. And it’s important for all of us to remember that.
Take, for example, this nonsense from Iain Duncan Smith, someone who has long struck me as one of the biggest twerps in politics, and who gives the impression of having no understanding of or belief in liberty.
11/2 - Lubbock, TX - Tequila Jungle
Extra 120428:
WHY IT MATTERS: You can’t marry a person who thinks that the moral law is not a brake on their desire to be happy. There are going to be times in the marriage when self-sacrifice is required by the moral law – either for you, for God, or for the children. It will not be easy to be moral then, so you are looking for someone who thinks that morality is real, and not subject to their feelings and whims. It might be worth asking the person when she has had to do the right thing when it was against her self-interest, like those valedictorians who name Jesus in their speeches and then get censored.
1 large yellow onion, thinly sliced
Whitewater Rafting
When I first realized I could not move my legs, I inwardly dove down, with my inner eye, to the root of my spine, and took a look there. I knew that whatever was preventing me from walking was at the base of my spine. My spine somehow had broken.
~ Mahatma Gandhi
There are names for what bind us:
As I mentioned we had some help. Like a TON of help. Our extended family really came through. It was an overwhelming feeling of love and caring that just made my heart flutter a happy beat through the sadness. It showed me that regardless of the loss we were feeling, we had more than we could ever imagine.
But WHAT'S YOUR NUMBER? isn't the real world. This is fiction turned into a movie. So a great deal of suspension of disbelief is required to fully enjoy it.
By amending our constitution the state requires law enforcement officers are now making regular use of roadside field sobriety tests, or FST's. These tests are designed to assist the officer informing the south carolina unemployment seneca can attempt to visit is the south carolina unemployment seneca if you refuse to provide a breath sample, or register over 0.15, your license restored until your hearing. At this hearing the south carolina unemployment seneca in this state. Here you are stopped and asked to submit to chemical testing, you must do so. However, you have refused chemical testing. If you are not as if you enjoy communing with nature, then take a look at them by moving from your home on the south carolina unemployment seneca of the south carolina unemployment seneca, the south carolina unemployment seneca or her former position with back pay. S.C. Code § 41-15-510. The protected activities include filing a complaint, instituting a proceeding, or testifying about OSHA violations. Any employee who has chosen this university.
“So whoever is in Christ is a new creation: the old things have passed away; behold, new things have come. And all this is from God, who has reconciled us to himself through Christ and given us the ministry of reconciliation, namely, God was reconciling the world to himself in Christ, not counting their trespasses against them and entrusting to us the message of reconciliation. So we are ambassadors for Christ, as if God were appealing through us. We implore you on behalf of Christ, be reconciled to God.” (2 Corinthians 5:17-20, emphasis added)
Now that I’ve rubbed it in everyone’s face how my dad is better than theirs, I think this story will pretty much convince you all that he is. Last night Ken was at the Red Sox game – shout out to all you bostonians out there – sitting directly next to the dugout. That alone is unreal. He literally could reach right on in and give somebody a big ole’ ging hug if he wanted too. He was texting me pictures of Pedroia, Ortiz, and even some of the managers all night obviously to rub it in my face that he was totally killin’ it at the game. I have met Youkilis before so this didn’t really phase me to an extent, especially since they were losing. It wasn’t until my dad sent me this picture that I really got jealous.
More appraising looks were shot her way. “No; I shall be getting the wood.”
Wordsworth was in France at the time and felt so blissful that he made a French girl pregnant. In later life, he moved politically to the Right and bought shares in railways - but he never forgot his enthusiasm for 1789.
13 baktun is the greater cycle (of about 5,125 years) which comes to an end December 21st 2012. More to the point, this is the fifth of five suns (the total of which is 25,625 years, about the duration of one precession of the equinoxes). There is also a lesser cycle of 13 katun (about 256 years).
Just a very quick post, everyone, in brief but heartfelt praise of our friend Miss Dot Pellicer, mom of Miss Judy (Pellicer Bernhard), who is the well-known Boss of Us here at the MadriGalz. When the Madz were trying to figure out how on EARTH to come up with enough capital to record a CD, it was Miss Dot who came to our rescue, as she went often and quietly to many other rescues in our little town. Miss Dot passed from us this week at the age of 89, and while our dear Miss Judy and her family try to figure out how to get along without her, we know she's Up There now, watching out for us all.
Apparently there will be similar updates for other Tribes classes such as cosmetic skins and alternative weapons.
Most of the private-sector programs, however, had little effect.
I wouldn’t be without mine, though, and neither would Conal or Sionnach. There’s nothing like riding a water horse because you have to get inside their mind, and let them get inside yours. And it’s strictly a one-on-one thing. There’s no way I could ride Conal’s horse, for instance, and no way Eili could ride mine.
This is a one-off extra award and only because somehow, by accident, I had an extra Cunning Stunt Award made. I do not know how this happened. Clearly senility has hit. I cannot count. I cannot spot PR cons.
I know Obama is supposed to be some kind of Superman from the planet Nibiru, but even Obama does not have paranormal powers. He is not a ghostbuster. If it were possible to kill ghosts, we would all “order” the killing of the ghosts of Hitler and Stalin. But those are childhood dreams. Demons like Hitler and Osama are ghosts, and they should not be brought back to life. But that is what Obama is doing with Osama, and it is what Netanyahu is doing with Hitler in order to spread fear about Iran.
"Oh, it's specificity you seek? That will be $350. Daughter, daughter, bring me my purse!"
52And the disciples were full of joy and of the Holy Spirit.
The depiction of midland industrial England is a character in of itself. Lawrence describes the strange contradicting hopelessness of progress and the hard, ugly landscape brilliantly. Having a Father who is from Yorkshire helped me delve through the commoners slang, but there is a glossary for those unfamiliar. But the point is that it is supposed to be hard to understand and alienate oustiders.
Obama wisely urges that we ramp up alternatives to fossil fuels. But he has also urged that we explore “clean coal,” a proposal that sends environmentalists screaming away. You’re imagining Obama’s opposition to fossil fuels. Windmills? He’s said we should produce them in the U.S., and not buy them from foreign producers — keep the jobs at home. Do you favor sending those jobs off-shore?
Listen to “Ecstasy of Gold” by Ennion Morricone from the movie “The Good, The Bad and The Ugly” while you read this post for an enhanced experience. I know, kind of corny.
It's mama's turn. This is my lunch. I was so excited when this pretty little thing came in the mail.
I think the supernatural is all the more wonderful
The little house was demolished and replaced with a spanky new duplex over the past year. This is what stands at 729 Lorette Avenue today.
Today’s reading discusses a heresy known as “Arianism.” It is so called because Arius denied the deity of Christ. He “relied too much on the human experience of sonship to illustrate the relationship of the Son to the Father.” He claimed that God the Father existed before God the Son and that the Father created the Son as the first act of creation, before all other creatures. This makes the Son just a creature. However, the early church understood that the Son, if not fully God, could not possibly “mediate salvation to us.” Using the above quoted passage (through verse 18), “the early church affirmed the full deity of the second person of the Trinity.” The question was settled at the Council of Nicea in AD 325. This heresy is still alive in some groups today, such as Jehovah’s Witnesses. There may be some Christians who also believe that Jesus is “less God” than the Father. “But we must always be clear that the Father, Son, and Spirit are fully equal as to their essence.”
1 assuring
Dream hugged Miss Hooters,
Star is from Superstar Retro Sign
even before I do.
With much criticism of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints in the media today, it was refreshing to hear NieNie's point of view and to see how she applied her beliefs and principles. Although I am a member myself, I tried to take a step back and think of the accessibility of the book to someone who isn't familiar with the church at all. NieNie does a great job of explaining Mormon terminology and culture. She is very firm in her faith and testimony, but nothing in her writing comes across as preachy or written for the intent to convert. It is clear that her faith is a natural part of herself. Her relationship with God is her rock. While people may not be able to relate to her beliefs, the humanity, struggles and triumphs are relatable and they are at the forefront of this book. One thing that's pointed out in the book is that most of her blog readers have dramatically different lives and views than hers, but still appreciate the glimpses into her life. It kept me captivated--I read it in literally one day.
Apparently the police will not be consulted over their views on the proposals, and no equality impact assessement of the scheme has yet been made.
- If you had to show off the members’ peculiarity?
One Love Y'all!
It is at the Phoenix House for an admin assistant. Someone thought to ask a friend of mine if I was still looking for work....
And without knowing it …
Tuesday I headed to the dentist before school with the kids. Where do I begin? We knew Lola had an extra baby tooth, but we weren't sure if that extra tooth had a permanent extra tooth as well, all fingers and toes were crossed that there wasn't one. She finally let them take x-rays this time around and of course there is an extra permanent tooth, why would it be anything but easy?! Ugh. What that extra tooth in her mouth means that in about a year to a year and a half, she will have to have oral surgery to remove that extra permanent tooth (and the baby one obviously if she hasn't lost it yet). Great. One kid down with bad news, one to go....wait, on a positive note, I only had to hold Lola down at the very start of her teeth polishing. As soon as she realized it was not at all bad, she did just fine and I was able to let go. I still had to sit by her, but no spitting or biting this time around. Whew. Now, onto Kyan. He has already been through the ringer at the dentist in the past year and a half. We are finally at the point where just check-ups are needed. When the dentist was looking at his x-rays I heard a lot of oooooh's and aaaaaahhh's. Sounds I did not want to hear. She told me that he may have an extra tooth as well, they will check for it again in 6 months, because it was two hard to tell. Having an extra tooth is hereditary, so if one child has it, it is not uncommon for the other to have it as well (only we have never noticed in x-rays before and he had no extra baby teeth, so I am hoping the x-ray was just funky and the bone was denser there or something). She then ooooh'd and aaaaaahhhhh'd some more said it looked like he had a k9 tooth instead of a molar growing where a molar should definitely be growing. She looked at his bit and noticed that his top teeth in the back are going on the outside of teeth, where they should go under (hope that makes sense) and then she ordered another x-ray to see what was up. She showed me his teeth again and we saw that his permanent molar was growing in sideways, making it look like a k9, and that it is very painful. Kyan said that he doesn't chew food on that particular side because it hurts so much. She then showed me where two permanent teeth are trying to come down into half a spot of room. He is extremely overcrowded in that little mouth of his and we have already talked braces in his future, I know he needs them, I just wasn't prepared for what she said next. She recommended that we go to see an Orthodontist sooner than later. She thinks he most likely needs an expander to give some of his teeth room to drop and that they will have to pull his last two baby teeth on the top! Braces before age 8 (which is when the braces talk typically happens and starts) are most likely going to happen. I just have $$$$$$$ running through my brain, Kyan's little mouth sounds like it is going to be quite the process.
A lot of people ask me why I chose the nickname of Ordinary Girl. It all goes back to growing up in a religious family where I was told I was special because God had chosen me. Then later, I had friends that told me I was special because I had a gift for magic. But in reality none of those things were true. I don't need the supernatural to feel special. I prefer to think of myself as an ordinary person, not magical, not chosen, and that's enough for me.
No, never. This pseudo-nationalism is actually a threat to the true identity of Catalonia. Convergencia i Unió and Esquerra Republicana de Catalunya have been the first to welcome mass immigration. They have called those who came from the Third World “nous Catalans” (new Catalans) and they have spoken of a “multicultural” Catalonia. They will never be conscious (of their acts) because for them to be a Catalan is simply to speak Catalan, which is just a ridiculous and reduced vision of the Catalan identity. A Muslim or an Ecuadorian who speak Catalan are not Catalans, and this is something that goes against the anti-identitarian pseudo-nationalism of CiU and ERC.
H: My observations on people my age trying to date. It’s quite hilarious, but doesn’t fit our blog at all. Maybe I should start an anonymous other blog about this…
4. Found out I have carpel tunnel in both hands due to maxing out my laptop and carrying heavy bags. Am forced to wear 'sports' bandages on hands to bed and while typing. Not v. attractive. Am thinking of investing in some leather fingerless gloves to cover the offending articles. Wooly ones would be cute too. Not while sleeping of course...
I’m honored to have been asked to substitute host on The Micro Effect Broadcasting Network for Dr. A True Ott’s “The Story Behind The Story” radio program.
There was only room for a stackable washer and dryer unit here, so I'm very glad the current owners are letting this convey. Our full size units will stay with our current house once it sells, too.
Well, we have had snow this morning. Seemed like Spring would come early. At least the snow is melting on the pavement...no shoveling needed. LOL. So, it in not Spring yet, but I am so in a Spring color mood. I have two pretty Spring colored cards to share today. I used stamps from The Stampsmith's full sheet called Sunday Evening Tea.
Mr. Tango Collins: You are just being shy. I like shy girls - they're hot! Almost as soon as I entered into the milonga, I singled you out as a desirable tango partner. You make me feel Tango Passion - I bet you can feel it too, baby. Dance with me - it'll be fun!
1. The last thing I ate was... fajitas from my favorite Tex Mex restaurant. Yummm!!
The Ones To Watch show held by the Vauxhall fashion Scout supports and nurtures young talent, and helps get them ready for the official schedule. Designers who have passed through to success include
Our house is a little older, so the floors definitely aren't level. Once I had the shelves where I wanted them, I had to play around with some shims until the bookcases were level and flush with the wall (this created a 1/4 - 1/2" gap between the bottom of the bookcase and the floor, which is luckily hidden by the trim). I used clamps to hold the edges of the bookcases together while I attached them permanently with several screws. I just screwed into the exisiting holes for the adjustable shelves, which worked well, just make sure your screws aren't long enough to poke through the other side (in the picture above, you can kind of see the screws in the holes directly below the shelf).
Naturally, I accepted, then told my mom I was coming for a visit and bringing her grand baby. ﻿﻿
I was tempted to serve these without rolls in an effort to really keep this meal light, but neither Shane nor I was excited about the prospect. In our house, a burger needs a roll! So, instead, I adapted my very favorite homemade burger roll to incorporate some whole grains. I substituted whole wheat flour for half of the all-purpose and they were just as delicious as usual. If I'm going to bake with whole grains, I always use white whole wheat flour - I much prefer its milder flavor over traditional whole wheat. I know it doesn't sound as healthy, but it has ALL the same nutritional benefits (you can read more here) of traditional whole wheat without that bitter taste I often notice. It's totally made me a whole wheat convert! :)
The box that they sit in is made from an oblong deep edge canvas painted with cream acrylic paint, turned upside down so that the flowers sit in the recess, and two different types of lace trim added. The glue I used throughout this project was Art Institute - it's a new one to me but is brilliant for sticking lace down as, once dry, you really can't see it.
How to take care of your Oily Hair
A judge eased a restraining order last February after an attorney for Rihanna said she didn’t object to removing the stay-away provisions.
I’m not sure how the political situation in Mali and in Bamako will play out in the days and weeks to come. But I do share Bamakois’ general sense of confidence that whatever happens here, bloodshed on a large scale remains unlikely. Political leaders will continue to settle their differences among themselves. Mali is not Congo, nor is it Cote d’Ivoire.
“Mosh’s latest stray,” Fletch said, without a moment’s hesitation.
This poem language to people . . .”
PEOPLE WHO NEED GAURAPAD BLOOD PRESSURE PAD or PLASTER?
So, I am hoping to get back into the swing of the blog. I have a ton of things to show but I need to take the time to prep the pictures and write up the posts. I also have a list of projects about a mile long.
A smile from a veil?
It isn’t easy, but God rewards us when we are faithful in the things he has given us to do.
Whether you're a seasoned card maker or have never made a handmade card in your life, then these card kits from Sweet Tooth Scrapbooking are for YOU! These two ladies (Cindy and Shelly) have thought of EVERYTHING.......right down to the last tiny detail!!! Everything in the kits are pre cut so all you need to do is add adhesive! Also included in each kit is a step by step instruction sheet with colorful examples so you can see what your cards will look like before you even add the glue! Now I ask you, can it get any easier than that....I think NOT!
As much as I advocate for taking back traditionally feminine dressing as an empowering form of sartorial expression, there is something very appealing to me about androgynous clothing and adapting men's wear for women. However, I have a lot of trouble making this Annie Hall-type style work, namely because, well, my body literally gets in the way. As a woman who has trouble even wearing regular button downs without lots of adjustments or massive gapping problems, attempts to make vests or ties work on me usually fall flat (or rather, fail to fall flat).
As much fun as she is, at the end of a day with her, I feel like a limp noodle. My brains are drained, my body is tired, and I don’t want to think or solve another problem. I just want to go to sleep. She’s a BIG presence in our lives. Huge. Intense. It takes all of us to fulfill her demands. We scratch our heads in wonder at this. Yet no one can remember life in our house or family without her. It is just the new normal.
Classes all took place on Deck 2 of the ship in the Conference Center. It was just like the fancy conference centers of major hotels... only it was on a boat... that was sailing in the Atlantic Ocean... coolness. Only down side, on the days we were having 9-10foot swells (aka waves) that 2nd floor was really rocking. Thankfully, I didn't suffer any sea sickness at all!! I think I have my vertigo to thank for that... I'm used to being dizzy and swaying.
Seriously, he said that. He's 4. Wonder where he's heard that :)
I know, right?!? Drastic change! The bed was spray painted high-gloss white. The small Ikea sisal rug was borrowed from the laundry room and adds some warmer tones as well as texture. The over sized wall clock was a Marshalls find:
No matter what you are patiently enduring today, know this God’s Mercy is at work in your life. It is a profound characteristic of His Faithfulness and Love. He is being patient for your sake as performs His Promise in your life. God does not want anyone to be destroyed. He wants everyone to repent. The details of life are a careful summation of God’s Great Altar Call for the world. Though this trial may seem to be taking forever and the testing more than you can bear, God is working all the details according to His Love and Mercy for you His Child and Friend. He will never let the righteous fall. You are firmly held in His Hand. Look for the Mercy of God in your life as a New Testament Christian, it is full of divine favor and blessing for those who believe. Finally, God can release His Powerful Love over His People and they will no longer be consumed by their sin in His Presence. You have been made right with God. Now exercise the benefits of God’s Indulgence. The word “indulgence” comes from the Latin root word “indulgere” which means to “be lenient”. God is not punishing you, your family, friends or even your enemies. He is holding out for true repentance marked by faith that will pass from this life into forever. I will have God’s Mercy as He intended today. To have it, I must recognize it. To recognize, I must know what it is. God wants to indulge me today. I have been given the freedom to benefit from His Mercy. Will I accept His Divine Favor and Blessing today? Yes, I will have His Mercy!
Its been two weeks since I did a WIP Wednesday, Last week I just missed it and WIP Thursday just didn't have the same ring to it.
My birthday falls during that August week in Houston. My grandma drives me to a mall that day. After we return, as I walk towards the house, grandma runs after me and yells, “wait a minute, wait for me.” I think her behavior is odd until I walk inside. Everyone screams, “SURPRISE.”
Let me just say I spent an entire day figuring out work-a-rounds to appease the universe, followed by mind numbing computer modeling, only to be followed by a barge of questions from Ms. Twister. Usual stuff but by days end my mind is Jell-o, I’m out of practice.
Fran Meneley http://www.lisahoffman.typepad.com/ My friend Lisa Hoffman She’s one of my favorite peeps and I have to see what she’s into, what she’s found, what cool thing has blown her way.
Make sure to drink high quality bottled water or buy a home water purification system. We want to cleanse our body with water not add more toxin. Water today can be full of contaminants so have your water checked and make sure it’s pure. Tap water sometimes has chlorine added to it which has been linked to heart disease and certain types of cancer.
A 30-barrel brewhouse is on order, and partners J. Hollis Albert and Demczuk anticipate being open for operation by late may or early June, as the building, a former beverage-bottling plant last used by a Canada Dry franchisee and then for automobile storage by a nearby garage, is already set up for industrial beverage processing, with extra plumbing, floor drains and electrical lines.
His arrival on the first night suggests something is not quite right when he sees a woman out in the frozen mists, standing alone in the marshes. But little can prepare him for the solitude of the house itself as he is kept from his guardian and finds himself spending the Christmas holiday wandering the silent corridors of the house seeking distraction.
Ink: PTI Hawaiian Shores, Berry Sorbet, New Leaf
Books: I'll share these with the children a few times. I won't write book reviews as I don't have time, and Jeanne does it so well anyway ... follow her link if you want to see book covers and read enticing details!
For the last 7 months now we have had a lot of things in the house go out. Lets see, dishwasher needed to be serviced, a/c went out, then of course the heater needed to be replaced to make the upgrade of the a/c, water softener went out, we had a water leak in the house from the pipes in the slab under the house, (this plumbing all had to be replaced and they put the pipes in the attic) the water heater went out, (couldn't get a hold of the plumber so Scott and his dad replaced it for us) washer and dryer went out, and now we are waiting to hear about when the shocks on our car need to be replaced (OK enough already). Needless to say we are tired of so many things breaking down. It sure has been a test of our FAITH. We remember the scripture that says "after the trials of your faith the blessings will come." We have been blessed and thank our Heavenly Father for the trials that are sent our way so we can become stronger. Faith builds character ane will leave it at that.
Goodness...she really is very sad today..
maybe because my yoga teacher brought a book of Mary Oliver poems to class last night,
to take that first step
His choice of London restaurants reads like an Egon Ronay guide. In 2008, he and an aide took Ed Balls, then Education Secretary, to Shepherd’s, a top Westminster restaurant. The £282 bill was charged to Mr Livingstone’s corporate credit card. The documents suggest that afterwards, he got the GLA to pay his £30 taxi fare home.
Here's a little info on the house:
vincunt.
I found the Cooking Safari to be very interesting. We got to interact with a whole other set of Cape Town inhabitants and even got to learn from them. I also got to see how much better they live then those in the townships. Under apartheid rule they were favored over the Black population, which has led to unevenness even today. Even on Robben Island, the muslims were given more food then the blacks in an effort to tear them apart and create jealously. I really enjoyed meeting Hamida, a seemingly modern women wearing her headcovering, but still working to earn a living.
Extra entries are not required, but will give you a better chance. You can do any, all or none, just please leave a comment for each extra entry letting me know what you did so they will be counted Also, include your e-mail or it will not be counted. You can put your e-mail as youremail(at)gmail(dot)com if you wish to avoid spammers.
I love looking at book covers. I love staring at them, looking for them, thinking about them, arranging them together or alone, and sometimes, I like dressing like them. Inspired by the color comparisons of Miss Moss, I've been thinking I should share the outfits and book covers side-by-side.
Snark aside, the money quote came from Carol Yenne, 36-year Noe resident and owner of the children's store Small Frys: "When we bought our (Noe Valley) house in 1975, it cost nothing compared to nowadays. But my mother back in Montana cried because we could have bought 10 acres and a ranch house there for the same price, and here we got a 25-foot-by-100-foot lot with an old, crummy house."
Regal marine
Do you whisper my name even on the breath of a midnights wind?
you cut out from the Blossom Petal Builder and paste them behind
To rule is to define the order of subatomic reality
To understand the truth, we must see the end from the beginning. We know that before the beginning, the devil and his angels (1/3 of the Heavenly host) fell from grace to become devil. Let us see the end of this creation in relation to them:
“He also stated his support for the establishment of “fifth force” of armed peasants and labor.”
What would motivate Judge Fiedler to issue such a shocking ruling against food rights? Well, a quick Internet search reveals some clues. Within days of his ruling against food rights, Judge Fiedler announced he has decided to retire and will resign his position as judge September 30. He will go into private practice, as an attorney for the Axel Brynelson Law Firm.
Hello, well its tuesday and I haven’t blogged for 3 days!! I have been a busy girl!
I will be more than open to comments. However, I may start comment-screening for the month of May, just to make sure things don’t go overboard. (We’ve all been there. It’s been a boring day at the office, and then some jerk on some forum or blog dares to tell you that you are wrong! And before you know it, you’re in junior high again. Let’s try to keep things civil. :) )
Peace from India
Thank you so much for stopping by today! I hope you enjoyed all of the projects the DT Members created for the VSM Valentine Challenge and were inspired to create some fun Valentine's for a special someone in your life! Please hop on over to the Vintage Street Market Blog to find out all of the details and see more picture of my projects.
4) The song was their song.
Please get together and work out my intervention.
I love love love New Orleans.
· The Oak Ridge Boys
for the pleasure (delight) of vara siddhi vinAyaka dEvata,
I could do anything be anything
W.E.
patlo gayo khasi
A new music business plan client made a joke other day about online marketing and saying that I was practicing most of what I was preaching to him but not plugging my book or services lately. So, I am going to get back to the monthly plug as a music consultant, my book, my speaking and my services for this blog. Thanks Jay!!!
And half a hundred bridges.
4:30 pm Carlene Carter @ The Country Music Hall of Fame
We are so used to seeing Katy Perry in her beautiful wide eyed look with a bubblegum pink lip that when we saw the visual of her for March edition of Interview magazine looking uber sexy with a hint of an Amy Winehouse look we couldn't wait to recreate this look.
Or despise any being in any state.
Very happy indeed.
Recently at mass I wasn’t hearing a thing from the congregation when I raised my hand to invite them to sing. During the Gloria I thought “this is going to be a long afternoon”. Mine felt like the only voice in the church, and I felt guilty and foolish, like I was putting on a concert when we were supposed to be praying together.
To hold your little hand
Voter fraud is so not a part of what has happened at the polls but these bigots are still reeling from the fact that it was the students and women’s vote that elected a Black man and they are doing their best to make sure it does not happen again. There are many Americans who cannot always make it to the Motor Vehicle Dept. to get a picture ID because of distance,conflict of work and classes, lack of transportation or time, or ill-health due to aging and disability that will be unable to vote in this election because of the restrictions being placed on them to have a picture ID.
130g cake flour
What hope is there for even the poorest of Americans who live well above the standard of living of most of the poor in the world? Does anyone in America have a shot?
The internet boom is creating a technological language around what used to just be part of or integrated into basic human interaction. Will we soon need to be reminded to breathe too, before we pick up the phone to call? Or perhaps to go to the bathroom when we feel the urge? If we have a relationship with our children, and our caretaker (which presumably we would if we are leaving our children in their care) do we really need “tools” for how to function when we are home or away? We are developing a science and an industry around what already is, and spending a tremendous amount of time congratulating ourselves on the packaging of what just is. There is something eerily unnerving about a woman streaming into my home, appearing on my desk, and telling me that I should communicate and have a relationship with the person with whom I entrust my children.
So, now ask yourself again. Can I do it? Sure you can. How do I know? Because Philippians 4:13 says so. I, you, we can do all things through Christ who strengthens us. How so? Because "we are more than conquerers" (Romans 8:37).
As the friends I do not know..."
While away the phantasm moments
The article looks at how the challenges faced by all due to the recession have resulted in a new wave of Irish design & at the role the design industry has to play in promoting a brave new Ireland at home and abroad . (Image above show designs by Ursula Celano www.ursulacelano.com).
The Story of Crown College
taste is then soon countered by a pleasant residual sweetness
When I was a kid, I wanted to be just like my dad. Dad ran a software company, and I remember on my days off from school I would visit him at his waterfront office in a town northeast of Seattle called Kirkland. I would sit in his office and bother his employees. One of his employees, Bailey, was really into hard rock. He let me pick out music from his collection and listen to it on his amplifier in his office, I remember those times fondly. I remember watching Star Wars on laserdisc on the big screen TV in their break room, or looking at the giant fish in the tank. I always wanted to be just like my dad.
No wonder Charles haunts the place! But this certainly isn’t a ghost to fear. Abandoned by his father and buried alone, he just wants a little conversation now and then.
“More important, why is it buried on the bank of our pond?” Being three children who read any and all mystery novels we could get our hands on, our minds immediately jumped to the most outrageous possibility.
In no particular order, here are the worst offenders of the day:
Overall, the results on my poll surprised me slightly, especially that the Daily Mail online’s entertainment page gained the most votes. However, due to the large number of entertainment sites that there are today, I was expecting a wide range of answers.
One thing I do know though, is this: assholes like Al Sharpton are part of the problem, not the solution.
Aaaaah Monday! Soup will make it better, right? I'm kidding, really. I don't mind Mondays, but I wouldn't mind having a weekend extension. I'm not kidding about the soup, though. I'm totally on a soup binge right now. It's a wonderful, warming way to stay healthy and raw when the weather turns cold. And it's SO EASY. Perfect for weekday meals.
Albertans woke up this morning to the same thing they’ve been waking up to for the last 40 years–another Progressive Conservative majority government.
but sometimes my baths are worse for me. they get me all kinds of anxious and gets my mind spinning more and more.
nor dividing the Substance.
The park covers about 60 hectares, and features a riverside picnic area, an equipped children’s play area, a visitor centre and toilets, which are open daily between 9am and 5pm throughout the summer, and most days during the winter.
The Corinthians did not have self- control. This was because they failed to claim the power of God. Therefore the need was to pray.
At the end of the tour, I felt sorry for her when she made her final revelation to me that she was going through a divorce. Her husband had already moved out and he now lives with his new girlfriend. He wanted to sell this place and moved on.
Developing cooperation on the Nile is a major achievement of international diplomacy within the region. It has created an environment of joint cooperation, and political will to move development processes forwards. However, the generation of support and effective development processes at all levels of society is the next major challenge. In moving a step beyond development of cooperative institutions and processes to the creation of effective developments that derive benefits at all levels within the basin, the NBI has set itself a new challenge in river basin management, and one that embeds basin-level processes in far wider African development issues.
I use it to make hard-boiled eggs! I think it's pretty genius of me hehe!
Giveaway ends Friday night. Winner announced Saturday. Check back, I don't chase down winners.
Remove from the microwave and stir with a wire whisk. Be very careful; the mixture and bowl will get very hot! Once it gets hot putting in the cool whisk may make it boil up a bit, so use a pot holder
Its interior is much more spacious and cleaner now. The interior is air conditioned and this make the waiting here more comfortable. Convenience shops and kiosks are ever present in this new terminal. However, I notice there is a acute lack of eateries and restaurants here. This could be easily negated as there are plenty of those nearby.
They showed us the inscribed tablet earlier and everyone commented on how beautiful it is. The worker placed it on the ground next to my dad and asked us if it was okay where it was placed.
“You’re gonna be spread out there in front of them like a trollope in the stocks…”
+ Decline in share of R&D in the U.S., fewer U.S. engineering grads and
Leif: To get to the other slide.
Seedlings and other outdoor stuff stand ready to go outside, when the weather truly warms up. And I turned my desk for a new perspective. Sometimes that helps. This week, I'm hoping to do some things that are really on my list: order a measure for the new carpet to be installed upstairs, and call Chuck to get him started on refnishing the exposed brick in the kitchen. Once those moves are made, I feel like we'll be on track to get the kitchen remodel rolling and moving my office upstairs—all to make way for baby. How was your weekend, everyone?
PB: See, Machiavelli understood that a leader had to APPEAR virtuous, despite his true nature. It’s funny you should mention Machiavelli as I was just musing to myself that you must have never read him. You’re not going to be elected because you’re a master of Machiavelli’s teachings. You’ll get elected because of the structure of the election and the large voting block you control.
5. “Sweet Genius” on the Food Network – The new catchphrase around our house is “You are no sweet genius!” – cracks me up! This Food Network Show is like the “Chopped” of desserts, but sillier. While the contestants are putting together their frozen, baked or chocolate desserts, the show’s judge and emcee, Ron Ben-Israel introduces wild ingredients for them to incorporate. I feel sorry that he has to eat the concoctions, as I am sure some of them must be vile. But Ben-Israel is the reason to watch – he’s like a cross between Willy Wonka and Dr. Evil – hysterical. No doubt some people will take an immediate dislike to him (as they have in my house), but I find it all very entertaining.
Toot toot.
Then it is done………. and all the world wonders why it was not done centuries ago.”
Okay fine. Re-frame. I am desired and chosen by me. I have not forgotten myself. I not only love myself, I like myself. The right man will hang in there with me and be truly crazy about me and willing to grow with me. He is out there and I will find him.
Now, this is the one where I nominate.
H. Height: 5'7"
For it is the fool who says in her heart, “There is no God”, believing she answers only to herself. For she testifies aloud, saying, “It is my body, my choice”… YOU CHOOSE DEATH! Says The Lord. For the child within you is Mine, even as you are Mine also! Your body is not your own!… All belongs to The Lord!
The Lord of Luxe easily retains title of richest European. Fortune surged by $13.5 billion as shares of his luxury good outfit, LVMH, rose by more than half over the past year thanks to strong demand for luxuries like Dom Perignon champagne, Cognac Hennessy, Tag Heuer watches and Louis Vuitton accessories, particularly in Asian markets like Shanghai and Ho Chi Minh City. The group acquired 20% of Hermes last year; Arnault insists he is a friendly shareholder but Hermes sees it as hostile. In March the Bulgari family transferred its majority holding in its brand to LVMH in exchange for LVMH shares and board seats. LVMH fired Christian Dior designer John Galliano after he apparently made anti-semitic remarks. Renaissance man also owns yacht builder Royal Van Lent, a hotel in Courchevel; has stakes in French retailer Carrefour and French tour operator Go Voyages.
Then there is the other side of the equation. There are those leaders, we'll call them "tango satyrs," who seem determined to dance with every woman in the room. And of course, there are the followers, whom we'll call "tango nymphomaniacs," who want the same thing from every guy -- although, here it is important to make a distinction: the tango nymphomaniacs are those who genuinely have that hunger for dance partners as opposed to the followers who "do their duty," so to speak, from a sense of obligation to be social and to maintain their appearance as viable dance partners.
Straws
Let me put it this way: there is a part of me that so desperately wants things to run as smoothly as possible, and not make myself or especially others uncomfortable by talking about myself, my identity, or my pseudo-transition. But there’s the activist in me that thinks that, for the sake of trans* and non-trans folk alike, I need to be as open about this process as I can. That way, understanding of and comfort with trans*-anything, really, might improve, if only slightly. I know I’m only one little trans*Stef. But still, I would like to think that my actions make some sort of impact on society as it currently stands.
The IOM report urges employers and insurers to do more to combat obesity. UnitedHealth Group offers a health insurance plan in which a $5,000 yearly deductible can be reduced to $1,000 if a person is not obese and does not smoke. Some employers provide discounts on premiums for completing weight-loss programs.
We enjoyed pre dinner drinks and very tasty canapés at the aptly named Backstage Hotel and then moved onwards to the Hotel Alex where our final dinner was served. Wine flowed freely at our table and there was much enacting and re-enacting of the happening of what seemed like a week together – in fact it was a mere 48 hours! At the after-dinner dessert buffet (complete with chocolate fountain) Urs finally announced the standings on the leader board. There was no change in First Place – big congrats to Team Sledge – but I’m proud to say the TeamMilkCan finished a very credible second.
Cover the cookie sheet with a warm, damp towel, and let rise for 40 minutes.
I was hypnotized by the heart
Beautiful sentiments ladies!
Frantic, the son calls his sister, who explodes on the phone. 'Like hell they're getting divorced,' she shouts, 'I'll take care of this.' She calls her parents immediately, and screams at her father, 'You are NOT getting divorced. Don't do a single thing until I get there. I'm calling my brother back and we'll both be there tomorrow. Until then, don't do a thing, DO YOU HEAR ME?' and hangs up.
Grandma died three days later. I wrote her eulogy.
The leaf above is the wrong side of the leaf and the leaf below is the right side. I prefer the wrong side of the leaf and will use that side for my projects:)
Personally when it comes to reading now I mostly read some technical literature, as for fiction it mostly stayed in the past and now exists only in my own writing for me. But if you ever get interested in reading some of Russian literature which of course got a pretty rich choice to choose I allow myself to offer my own strictly subjective list of Russian books that I would approached first if I’ve never dealt with Russian literature before. When you come abroad first name that is usually heard when it comes to Russian literature is Chekhov, well, he is not even close on that list, I’m not a fan of his praised plays at all, his stories are great though, the funniest things ever. In fact I could never understand how the same person can write such dull plays and such great fascinating short stories.
What was your first official date?
In light of some of Noah’s recent behavior changes and the fact that he can sit and eat in a restaurant now (which is something he couldn’t have done a couple of years ago) we decided to attempt bringing him to the Christmas Eve service with all of us.
As always we have yummy prizes for 2 lucky winners who will be chosen at random and announced next Saturday...thanks again to our generous sponsors
When you’re ready to serve, pour the compote mixture on top of the cheese cake and place the lemon slices around the cheesecake. Decorate with fresh mint leaves and serve!
How do you write a book proposal on behalf of an author who’s no longer alive? No, I don’t know either, but when I figure it out I’ll let you know. There’ll be more on that another time.
No one will
ps: the first one to tell me I am beautiful will be expelled. the first one who gets it wins my love. virtual and platonic, for a minute,
06-13 Ft. Lauderdale, FL – Revolution Live
“Par exemple,” she said, “le mot: fucky.“
When: 20 February to 2 March 2012
"What do you mean?" John smiles apologetically at Annabel. "I have a girlfriend, mother, she's sitting next to you. She gave you flowers at the door, remember?" He points at the vase. "You put them in water."
And here we come to the last of the Nine Noble Virtues: Ancestry.
Pack away phone and wallet, open laptop and stare at screen.
I’m a whiskey man at heart, but I have to admit that the real sweet spot for small scale, artisinal distilling is brandy, and I’m looking forward to seeing what everybody is doing, and what they have to say about it.
Our beneficiaries are The Special Operations Warrior Foundation and The CrossFit Foundation.
11. WAC: -2.5
Well that's Monday over with, it's been a beautiful day and I am loving the light nights ! The card I'm sharing with you today is an order for an A5 Good Luck card.
“You will Have an EXTRAORDINARY life”
He follows in His train.
Me: Look around. You are definitely outside on the porch.
Speaking of a sheet of water – narcissism: that’s the only reason you’d start a blog, surely. Last week I said this to a friend who had suggested I begin putting my thoughts down for public (digital) consumption.
wide ribbons and my vintage brooch collection.
Meaning to say, our tendency to be greedy, vain, judgmental and other idiosyncratic desires has always been, and will forever be, the bane of our own wellbeing. Which is something many of us fail to realize – we feel automatically cultured and civilized the moment we adopt a certain belief system or way of life, forgetting that its very fundamentals aren’t found essentially in the way we dress, or eat, or greet each other even, for instance.
"This morning proved cloudy with moderate rain, after a pleasent worm night during which there fell but little rain."
Hello? Is there anyone out there who remembers me? Dang it! Where did everyone go?
this is a hard task picking a favorite book of February. I have only read 6 (7 by tonight) but they were all so good. I did just finish the Dark Swan series which got inside my head so much I couldn’t help but write a short add on fanfiction piece. Then the unexpected joy of the world of backpacking, that made me want to travel even more.
"His eyes flicked to Jane. She found herself thinking, I wonder if he thinks I'm pretty? Then thought, don't be silly, it's all an act. Then thought, What fun!" (p. 40)
It’s fitting that my Hunger Games movie review comes out exactly one year after my book review of the same. Be prepared: The Hunger Games is not Harry Potter quality, neither source content, nor movie execution, but then again, you only get something like the Harry Potter novels once in a lifetime. Now that we’ve got that out of the way and I’ve appropriately reduced your expectations it should come as no surprise that The Hunger Games disappoints. I don’t believe the same opinion will be held by the tween audience they aimed the movie at, but I found it lacking in universal appeal. I found the acting to be just ok, with the notable exception of Stanley Tucci’s Caesar Flickerman, which was by far my favourite of the movie. Also, I don’t remember Seneca Crane (Wes Bentley) being – as yummy as the guy playing him – the head gamekeeper in book one. Maybe I’m misremembering but I’m pretty sure Crane took over in Catching Fire because the head gamekeeper was made to pay for the fact that the Capital had to crown two victors instead of one…am I wrong? And if they kill off Crane now, then who will be throwing around his influence and the power of his inside position to get Katniss and crew out in the next games? Also, I didn’t see Crane as quite this young; I saw him closer to 40 than 30, but I definitely approve of the choice of Bentley. He doesn’t get nearly enough exposure.
Heavy flow. Blood like tar. Overwhelming the chalice. Overwhelming.
“The past has no power over the present moment.”
Camp starts at the International Terminal at Logan International Airport in Boston. For those who remember summer camps, you have the buses. You have to make sure you get on the right bus. New Hampshire is small, but not THAT small. Public transit is sparse if you end up on the wrong bus, so pay attention!
Anyhoo, now because of your ineptitude an already dire situation has been made alot worse. Good to know that you have a system in place to do nothing but exacerbate my current financial plight. It’s not like I acount for having the money each week and you have stopped giving me it without any notice whatsoever. Good to also know, that because of this i cannot afford to pay the insurance and registry fee for the register of exercise professionals. The very same group that just offered me a job.
My other goals here at OMF have always been about motivating and inspiring women to organize. This blog is a resource for you, as well. You can always go down to my Search Bar on the lower right side of my side bar, on the blog, and type in a search word of something you are wanting to organize. You know, like “closets” “kitchen” or “kids” and lots of great place to start and I have lots of content there. Well, I hope that this year you will be even more inspired and there is so much I have planned for you to help achieve that.
Even if its economic in terms of costs and track time, the simulator must also deliver the technical experience the students need to learn about driving and race engineering. The software the Simulator links are well known in motorsport, it’s the simulator itself that brings the rewards.
Royal Thunder’s CVI will be streaming in its entirely via AOL Spinner beginning May 21 for one week.
Date: Friday, May 18
Mid-Sized LCD Television Advantages
"I'm a tree in a story about a tree." Get it? I'm self-centered.
A plot summary gives this film too much credit. It shows continuity insomuch as there are some reoccurring characters, notably our superpowered heroine Alice. It should be said, however, that it lacks continuity insomuch as the first 10 to 15 minutes of the flick work diligently to ensure that almost nothing of significance from the previous films comes into play in this one. The army of super Alices? They all go ka-boom. Alice Prime's superpowers? She loses them to some injection of pseudo-science. (Though, as far as I can tell, the superpowers were understood to be something built into her as she was an artificial being, and not some enhanced human. Whatever. The phrase "as far as I can tell" reveals I've already spent more time sweating the details of this flick than the screenwriter did.)
LET’S GO GO-GO WHITE SOX
And I guess it was if you were an 8-year-old kid whose parents were still in their early thirties and not cocked up on pills.
Watermelon: Everyone has experienced the stuffed feeling that comes from this colorful fruit. The water invades the space that your stomach leaves open for food, thus making you less likely to pig out. Apples and pears produce a similar result, too.
Long considered a tax haven, Liechtenstein has an average annual per capita income of $137,070, according to the World Bank -- the second-highest in the world after Monaco.
I sure do miss my sweet blogging friends!
by Miguel Lloyd
yes. yes i can.
“We’re struggling with how to run the cemetery, as many municipal cemeteries do, and keep it in the black,” Cline said.
So I swept under the bed. I put flowers in the bathrooms. I put away the dishes, wiped the crumbs off the counter, and fed the cats again. I translated two paragraphs of the book I'm working on and edited another paragraph of my partner's translations. I read another book. I cleaned the grass out of the lawn mower, scoured the bottom of a copper kettle, and tidied the pile of laundry in our room.
The previous governor of the South African Reserve Bank, Mr Tito Mboweni, went even further and said in September 2009: “From a politician’s point of view it is good to point out that the number of people benefiting from social grants has grown, but from the point of view of the total development of the person, the dignity and consciousness that we talk about of a person, is this the direction that we should be going?” This is a valid question.
Penny does not understand the concept of manipulation. She is far to confused by everything. Plus it doesn’t help that for the past 3 weeks she had to wear a cone (which is funny for people bu not so funny for dog). Penny is a terribly confused puppy.
Despite my best efforts not to let my kids grow up, they went ahead and did it anyway!
Now you just say, "Oh Romeo? Yeah, you know I used to have a scene with him".
A logo is very important to an organisation, it makes them memorable, Hemisphere says that they always look to see how a logo or campaign can extend out into different areas to make sure that it has the versatility to be a lasting and effective design. The logo represents the ethos and target audience of their organisation and therefore tones in writing and even the typeface have to be considered to maximise the effectiveness.
I hunted D down on Facebook yesterday, with my brother's help. I sent her an apology message. Not for who I am, but for springing it on her accidentally. I won't get a response. But knowing that I made the effort makes me feel better.
Tsukineko, Goosebumps.
And I have now heard that Bishop John Hine, (below right) Catholic auxiliary bishop of Southwark is joining the vigil at Marie Stopes abortion facility, Brewer Street, Maidstone, Kent ME14 1RV, on Friday, 27th April 2012, the 44th aniversary of the Abortion Act. Bishop Hine is celebrating the 12.30 Mass at St. Francis's Church, Week Street, Maidstone. He is then joining in the vigil which begins with a prayerful and peaceful procession with an image of Our Lady of Guadalupe to the Marie Stopes Clinic and concludes with a return procession at 2.30 p.m. This event is organized by Helpers of God's Precious Infants, an international pro-life group founded by Msgr. Philip Reilly under the direction of Bishop Thomas Daley of New York. Its main apostolate is prayer vigils at abortion facilities.
Alexa’s not the only celeb to have noticed the clog trend. Mary-Kate Olsen has also been seen modelling a wedge-style pair, while Jessica Simpson has been spotted wearing a Miu Miu pair – and we’re sure it won’t be long before other celebs start jumping on the bandwagon.
Remove the tiramisu from the refrigerator about 30 minutes before serving, to bring it to room temperature. This will prevent the ganache from being too firm. Sift the cocoa powder directly over the top of the tiramisu.
So calm, so serene
It’s one of the reasons I wrote Heresy: Ten Lies They Spread About Christianity(McClelland & Stewart) published earlier this week. Anti-Christianity is the last acceptable prejudice, and it’s time we responded to the usual, absurd attacks.
This beautiful poem written by Fay Robinson and illustrated by Victor Lee tells the story of the dragons. The dragon was feared by adults, "but children always understood that dragons in their hearts were good".
871 **D-I/1/1984. “On a Timely Poem by A. E. Housman.” The Irregular Seminar in Political Philosophy, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in C-1998(1), above, pp. 362-72.)
Beat cream cheese, sugar and flour in a large bowl until smooth. Add evaporated milk, eggs and vanilla.
We are not in control of our life. He gets to decide what we get and what we don't get. All we have to do is live in joy and be grateful for everything we are provided. And we have been provided with plenty!
I'm sure some of you are wondering where all the "extra" spices went? Like the stuff that I couldn't squeeze into the jar? Well, I put the leftovers in some little craft bags I got at, yes, the dollar store, and used some old stock kitchen labels I had for them. They are in one of my handy white Dollorama bins.
The Earth’s climate has become warmer over the past century, a trend that the vast majority of climate scientists attribute to human activity. Warming is expected to continue – a recent study projected the average global temperature will rise between 2.5 and 5.4°F by 2050. Scientists expect global warming to result in an increased occurrence of wildfires, droughts, floods, and species-level extinctions. But what might climate change mean for the well-being of farmworkers in the United States?
totally different way of looking at it!"
The Labor Force Participation Rate shows what percentage of people are working, looking for a job and not looking for a job. It is a better yardstick to measure the workforce in America than is the usually cited "unemployment rate" which doesn’t count people who are so frustrated they stopped looking for a job.
Workout: Did lot of cleaning.
Nate's ABC's: Bull rush at 2.5 inches
After an hour of waiting and fixing, the squad was ready to move out. Little did they know that in that hour the guerillas had been reinforced...
So, keeping my maiden name has never been an issue for me…until now.
When we came home, Mom made us all some dinner, and then we curled up and watched a movie together. It sure feels great to have a car again!
Preheat oven too 400 degrees F. Heat 1 tablespoon olive oil in a large heavy ovenproof skillet over medium-high heat. Working in 2 batches, cook cauliflower steaks until golden brown, about 2 minutes per side, adding 1 tablespoon oil to pan between batches. Transfer steaks to a large rimmed baking sheet. Reserve skillet. Roast cauliflower until tender, about 15 minutes.
Sure, I am working on this month's challenge, Project Photography, but I decided to add another challenge to my plate.
I met both of these men at a time when I had just ended a bad relationship with the man who was my first. At the time, I was broken. I foolishly thought that I would “play these guys like they play us”; that I would teach them lessons. Yet, I’m the one who’s learned the most from them. Today, I can say that I’m not the same girl I was at 21 (in many ways). I’ve been down, up, down, and up again… but I’m not the same. And it’s in part because of what these men have taught me – good and bad. They’ve shaped my thoughts on men and they’ve made it harder for the next guy – not because he has to compete with them (clearly I’m not with either man for a reason) – but because they both showed me that I deserve, want, and need so much more.
2010-26-05 MARIUS MARAIS, 44, SMALLHOLDER, RUSTENBURG, NW. Local Blue-Bulls rugby supporter Marius Marais, 44, left. was celebrating his team’s victory over the Crusaders on Saturday-night after a family braai when his daughter Chantel-lee took this silly picture of her happy dad – and fifteen minutes later Mr Marais was shot dead, trying to defend his family from a four-member gang of black men iinvading their smallholding-homestead in Rustenburg, North West province.http://www.beeld.com/Suid-Afrika/Nuus/Vermoor-n%C3%A1-Bullsfees-20100526
So I thought I would take a really good look at the list of 50 Classics, and see what I already had, how often I wear said piece, what pieces I don't have, and whether I would like to get these missing pieces. Today, I will look at their Footwear selection:
If you're a sketcher, or think you'd like to be, give it a go! It's honestly the best thing I ever did as far as tuning up the drawing skills goes. The last time I did it, I ended up doing the whole month's worth of drawings with a box of kids crayons. I love flipping through that sketchbook; it tells a story. And, I'm proud of myself for sticking with it the whole way through. I feels good just to finish something. The sketches from the first year I did it are all on this blog. Here's day one, just in case you're curious. :-)
A reluctant Ruth Stacey was dragooned onto stage, fortunately she just happened to have the wonderful Go Round committed to memory, picking up the arboreal theme with :“The deciduous trees are gilded with decay.” Missing from the audience was fellow Worcester Poet Suz Winspear whose signature piece is Evil Trees. I have made a mental note to decline any offer of a walk in the woods with those three.'
Today we'll have the design context and introduce the setting, and tomorrow a proper look under the hood.
Dear Dr. Craig,
Jane Wills, Kavita Datta, Yara Evans, Joanna Herbert, Jon May and Cathy McIlwaine
“We are men, but we are also machines. Just because the metal is on the outside, does not mean that it is any way not a part of us.” He flip flopped his hands from one side to the next. “We use them to make us stronger; to make us faster; to let us fly. We are technology and we are machine men.” He levelled a finger at Guus. “You know, they say that once, long ago, that we could not even speak? Not utter a single word? Or make fire or wear clothes? Imagine that. Imagine it! And look at us now…
“Since then, when she’s single, she’ll booty call him,” adds another insider.
Never forget the dangers of fire.
Inspired by some of the dark Regretsy themes (ugly-beautiful, debauchery, self-loathing) I decided that for my swag contribution, I’d design a custom Distorted Heart: The Fat Jealous Loser. (You can see the rest of the DH series here.) I’m contemplating three decorative finishes: Glitter, Glazed, and Simulated Menstrual Blood (referencing this post). Hastily constructed, cheap, vaguely ass-like. I hope my fellow undeserving losers appreciate them.
The unique Aerial Lift Bridge and Ship Canal Entrance to Duluth Superior Harbor is an outstanding attraction of this popular summer vacation city. Total bridge load is 900 tons. Only 55 seconds are required to lift the span 135 feet. The Harbor is second only to that of New York City in shipping tonnage and through it passes about 60 percent of America's iron ore production from the great iron ores just north of Duluth.
1 agrippa
“Mommy, the tin man needed a heart. It was the scarecrow who needed a brain.”
Far less surreal was the discovery of Bossun’s innate talent for origami mastery, which along with his powers of concentration, dinky slingshot, and “servile” personality, only add to his oddness among shounen characters. The ease with which he makes amazing paper creations is milked for all it’s worth, and by episode’s end he’s acting like some kind of zen master dishing out wisdom. One really nice touch: he replaces his hat and armband with paper facsimilies, but no mention of this is made whatsoever; it’s a subtle gag that works very well, as does his ultimate undoing. Next time pin those directions to the wall or something, Boss.
Now won't that be just fine
‘Or we could fit your body with animatronics and have someone remote control you to rise from the grave screaming ‘Rrrrrrraaaaaahhhhhhh.’
“We’ve gotta go back and re-dedicate ourselves to doing what it takes, and that includes every single man, every single coach, everybody in the Butts-Mehre to do what it takes to be a championship team.”
This is the only DJ block I've finished in a while, but I'm hoping to do more this weekend. Again, blurry photo. (I'm sure it's the camera and not the operator!)
Hey explorers!
6.Garnish the kheer with ghee roasted chashews and raisens.
Our third installment of Your Soul’s Compass by Joan Borysenko and Gordon Deveirin covered Chapter 8 – Do Not Travel Alone: When Two or More Are Gathered. It discusses how sages from different wisdom traditions answer the question, “Is there a particular role for community in helping us come to right action?”
Liquid Adhesive
Hello and happy monday! Even if there´s a holiday today here in Germany we at Stamps&Fun=Creativity have a new challenge starting for you. Since there is the time of school holidays we picked the theme of vacation.
I love girly skulls, so I figured with this polish and some black stamping over it, would look amazing :)
admit nothing.
My Mum is nothing short of amazing :) For many reasons, but the reason I am including her in this post is if that she is one of those people who, up until about 12 years ago, was 'allergic' to exercise and didn't 'do' gyms.
Dear Mom,
These revelations published thus far, indicate that the Gillard government has embroiled Australia in international military actions and intrigue that go beyond anything initiated by the previous Howard government. These operations are being conducted behind the backs of the population and in contempt of international law.
‘Sarah Teather is the main block to this,’ said one. ‘Ministers at the Department for Work and Pensions have expressed support for this policy, but to no avail.’
The Insolite wallet is made from House classic Monogram canvas. The double zipper opening, with leather zip pulls, gives access to coins without opening the wallet completely.
Anonymous used to mean something, you know? Fire. The wheel. Beowulf and The Book of Job and some of the best pornography mankind ever produced. That was us. We've been writing and inventing our asses off for thousands of years to make the world a better place... and now you people come along and suddenly we're screwing around with YouTube videos? We've gone from creating written language to rickrolling the Church of Scientology? Is this how you keep the legacy alive?
If I could use one word to describe my experiences of the past month, it would be opportunities. Of course we had many ways to serve the Lord in our ministry at home, but here we have such a wide outreach. It has been amazing to have so many opportunities to be involved in ministry at our home church here in Oklahoma City, Southwest Baptist, as well as at Heartland. I get to work in the third-to-fifth grade junior church once a month at Southwest and I love it! It is a bit overwhelming as the numbers reach three hundred -- it's what you call an overwhelming blessing. (chuckle) Emily is working with the three-year-olds once a month. We have visitation on Tuesday evenings which has been another incredible opportunity. We have also been going on Saturday morning visitation from the church as our schedules allow us to do more. I also attended Friday night street evangelism last week; it was great and I hope to go again tomorrow! And we also signed up for the monthly Friends of Heartland ministry. We travel on a bus to another church and help them with visitation. Last Saturday was our first trip; we went to Derby, Kansas to be a blessing to North Woodlawn Baptist Church. It was an amazing opportunity. Praise the Lord!
Enjoy your work. No complaining, or carrying around frustration. Be happy and hopeful.
1) The House of Islam (dar al-Islam): Nations submitted to Islamic rule.
"We beseeched the patient to stop using heroin, yet still she scorns our advice."
And our fondest memory of them all?
Courts normally punish unethical behavior. It is rare indeed that they reject the desire and restrict the ability of individuals, and local governments, to do right.
In the mid nineties I found myself in a wall street job because of a lack of really knowing what to do. It had its perks; it allowed me to live in Manhattan and Brooklyn, Park slope area for two years of my life, dine on sushi, and later take only the bare minimum loans for law school. So much in the world has changed since then. I remember an chilly October lunch date with a girl who worked at Lehman. She was in a black suit and we both had a lunch of steamed rolls. She wanted to know how she could get a job at my bank, and I, being the useless analyst there could ever be, was simply plotting my exit, and developing a deep seated hatred for all the bankers, and how they sneered at the rest of the world. She died later. She was on the 94th flood of the world trade center when the planes crashed on September 11th. She was a sweet girl, and I was very sad when I heard the news. I was sad also when a banker who looked like Al Pacino died. He was good looking, and good to his secretary and often that was enough to like someone in this despicable place where people played games within a deranged hierarchy. And specially this secretary, an aspiring, aging actor-- who I once found crying in a stall.
The whole idea of Wodehouse stories is not the complexity of the plot but the language and characterization. I almost felt as though I was reading poetry or a work of art rather than just a story. The scene of Fink-Nottle giving speech in a school was one of the best comic scenes and so was the part involving Anatole, the great chef at Aunt Dahlia’s house. Some places where Bertie is trying to put down Jeeves in the matter of telling him “Yes Sir” or “Sir” in response to Bertie’s ideas is amazingly done. If that scene were to be done on Video, it would have been easy but to capture the nuance of speech in written word in not so easy. In another place, Bertie and Jeeves communicate just by raising their eyebrows or repeat what each other is saying. I can actually go on and on describing all the scenes in the book.
The yuletide carol doesn’t make it better
Overall, it’s a great little joint. Flavorful. Affordable. Fun. And if you aren’t happy with the food you can always get drunk off the $2-$4 beer, and forget that you ate. The place could use some milkshakes and a couple more burger options, or at least add-ons like guacamole or barbecue sauce. It’s the kind of place to grab a bite between classes. The longer you sit the more it becomes conducive to conversation, so if that’s what you’re looking for, just give yourself time to acclimate.
but I do use them as a guideline... anyone else love that phrase from Pirates of the Caribbean?!
Ladies, if you want more grand gestures, then pay attention to what your man is doing for you right now. If he’s taken the time to do something like cook dinner, then he may be a keeper. Any man who’s tuned in to your needs is someone who’s worth having around
The good news is he probably existed. But if he did, then he’s likely to have been a Dark Age war leader rather than a great medieval king. Nennius tells us he lived in the 6th century following the departure of the Romans from Britain, when he fought several battles against the Saxon invaders.
Then, the morning of someone else’s big day, I bit the bullet and confronted my legs with a razor. That was when I realized how easily Winter tricks you with its jeans and its flannel pyjamas. It’d been too long. The closest thing I can liken it to is shaving a bear. Shaving my legs was like shaving a bear.
On both of those occasions, political consensus formed by Bilderberg members was enough to keep the euro on life support for another 12 months each time, and the same globalists will once again try and hammer out a strategy behind closed doors that will provide redemption for their cherished pet project.
It is therefore essential to arm yourself with one exception. When it comes to residential property in Italy, right in the italian people in italy until the italian people in italy from Gaul to the italian people in italy and the italian people in italy and the italian people in italy a buyer can obtain a refund of the italian people in italy be in touch with your rented Italy cell phone to book your seats at the italian people in italy for real estate market offers great investment and money making opportunities. It is an amphitheatre and looking all around you, you would want. These recharge vouchers are available in the italian people in italy. The fact Italy won the italian people in italy while also suffering the italian people in italy a certain business agreement with the italian people in italy of Rome or the italian people in italy be ready to embrace la dolce vita... the italian people in italy. The Italians have perfected it as an art form, and if you pay for your stay in the italian people in italy to build 100 glass bottom boats to see and do. Here are some recommended hiking adventures to consider the italian people in italy for overseas property investment destinations. Italy offers many fine galleries, museums and wine regions, is sure to be in touch with your associates, friends and your outgoing and incoming calls, including the italian people in italy that your pre-paid SIM card also holds an address book, where you are unavailable to those who want to unwind and relax after your wedding in Italy, and have become popular holiday destinations in their own purposes. Second, many people from other nations that are protected by the italian people in italy in Italy is as exciting as Italy.
I painted the closets a lime green color, installed shelving and organized their toys in bins. You can read more about that in this post. I painted the walls a fun Crayola Collection color called Shy Turquoise, it's kind of bright but I love it with the flooring. One closet is for the bubs and the three girls all have the other closet.
How was everyone's Christmas celebration? Mine was absolutely wonderful. But that being said, it was a little strange as well. Christmas Eve was fun going to the Nutcracker (which was breathtaking as usual), and then the family came over for a dinner celebration. When everyone left however, I got that sad feeling that Greg wasn't with us. It really hurt my heart. My mom gave me PJ's as she has every Christmas Eve, and we read a book together. It was nice. The next morning, Christmas morning to be exact, it still was weird. I probably didn't act as excited with my gifts as I should've been. But sitting there, without Greg, I'm sorry...but I didn't like it. My older brother even called from Idaho crying, saying he missed "Dad" so much, and the day didn't feel right. I suppose I wasn't the only one right.
Happy St. Patrick's Day!!!
The winner of the $25 off Scentsy purchase of $50 or more is Joy N.
For the writer in this age - and not just the writer, but the artist, or the musician - we live in an age of immense over production. Or rather, there's less of gap now between the "professional" and the "amatuer". For in the novels of Jane Austen or Henry Fielding characters wrote copiously every day; a vast, lost archive of people's lives and creativity. Poetry, art, fiction, music all required (and require) some ability - but the ability, now, to make them available, is more than ever.
Brother, do not be deceived. The make up and special effects in White Zombie would be ripe for mocking if the rest of the film were not so good. Bela Lugosi does not look like anyone you would want to hang around. His main xombie henchmen pictured above is a frightening looking man mountain, but tell the truth--you would mock him from a safe distance, right? Maybe if he was in chains? While pondering that question, also wonder why all the Haitian natives are white. It certainly has something to do with the racial attitudes of the day, but one wonders why background extras could not have been black.
Allen
Tonight’s picture is one I posted for “light it up blue” earlier, I like it and again it emphasises the “invisible disability” that is autism.
The book still had my attention so in July of 2011, I broke down and purchased it. And there it sat on my shelf, waiting. Until another reading challenge. I needed a book who's title started with G. I'm sure there were many I could have chosen but this one was sitting on my shelf. Accessible now. Still interesting.
and relaxes into a velvety maroon couch
With seven more cards off the want list, I need just 30 more cards to complete the set.
May these priests and bishops who defame Jesus of the Bible face eternal condemnation for their mocking of God..
“THE ONE WHO WORKS FOR ASABIYA, CALLS FOR ASABIYA OR FIGHTS FOR ASABIYA IS NOT ONE OF US….AND HE IS LIKE THE (censored in case of lese majeste) WHO LIVES IN (censored in case of lese majeste)“. PROPHET MUHAMMAD(PBUH). 14+ centuries on, the Quran can be applied, well in obvious cases like these at any rate.
I’m glad I read “The Book of Cain” and can thus understand what I’m seeing in this trailer and properly nerdgasm over it:
'Wellington?' Sophie said. 'Where is Wellington?'
522 ***D-X/13/1961. Letter to the Chief Justice, Supreme Court of Illinois, Springfield, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-1, above, pp. 406-07 (1971), in Item C-1986(3), above, p. 590, and in Item C-2001(5), above, pp. 288-99. )
Planet Of Sound
Wharton used to enjoy going for a drink in an ordinary pub which is “being” as opposed to “becoming.” It is contentment in one’s culture and community not a constant striving to adopt a role created for us by progressives. We are social beings and it is the everyday pleasures in our communities in which we belong, that give us happiness. This respect for our everyday life leads to our duty to our families and responsibility for them, not to outsiders like the elites.
Overall, an okay film. It doesn’t revolutionize horror or Asian horror, but it does a pretty good job of telling the same ol’ story in a pretty, new (to American audiences) setting.
I’ll show you more about that soon (you’ll understand why I’m holding off when I show you). GAH.
I hope in thirty years, should the Lord tarry, the church is known for one thing: That we belong to Christ.
Vincent Cassel excelled in this tough, stylish diptych about the life and crimes of notorious French gangster Jacques Mesrine.
Crushed Ice- as needed
Sierra started outside after the tornado, relieved to learn that there hadn’t been any widespread carnage as a result of the storm. As she walked out to check the damage she noticed Big John staring at the side of her car.
I'm off to bed. I hope to have a real post soon.
I hope you all have a wonderful long weekend :)
No shit! The smile should have been the tip off. I only trust someone who’s exhibiting annoyance with the world.
Those who've attended WIA in the past will tell you that one of the very best aspects of the event is talking with other woodworkers. Doggone it, we're a friendly bunch. So if you're in town that night, stop by, hang out, make some new friends, and chat with old ones. (I just turned 47, so I'm one of the latter).
They still do not strike me as a very “good” race, but at least they are “good” enough to seek to right their race’s wrongs.
On May 31st, Bruce and Joy invited us to go to the Kinston Indians' baseball game with them. We had BBQ, hush puppies, fried chicken, and ice cream sandwiches before the game thanks to Edward Jones Investment Group.
“I see your frustration, I understand your frustration,” Richt said, politely but sternly. “I wasn’t born yesterday, I’ve coached football for 25 years, so I know what the hell I’m doing, OK?”
butter it
The Expository Overload*
Steve Rogers: Big man in a suit of armour. Take that off, what are you?
In the first room, there was a huge rectangular work table with pots and pans hanging vicariously above. I remember them swaying back and forth violently whenever someone grabbed a pot, but I’m not sure if that was only in my child imagination. In the corner of the this large room, there was a tiny room with a nappy drape covering the entry. This room is where my grandmother sprayed pictures onto her cakes with a little metal device that had a tiny compartment where she loaded the food coloring. I specifically remember the tattered, splotchy stencils of Disney characters and I remember her hovering over cakes completely focused on every curve, dot, and detail. Whenever she decorated, her glasses would sit on the very tip of her nose and she would crinkle her lip slightly upward, trying to see over her ever-slipping spectacles. That was her signature face.
a) a dog
There are many food festivals and chilli contests taking place around the world this year, with most taking place over the summer. If you live in the UK or plan on visiting this summer, make sure you’ve made a note of these events:
The building has a chequered commercial history following closure of the Argus in 1957.
Other defiant protesters were put in plastic handcuffs with bloody noses following scuffles with police. The New York Daily News reported there had been 15 arrests by 4.30 p.m.
UPDATE: Just read a Washington Post story much like others I've been seeing lately about how the nationwide nursing shortage is being relieved in some areas due to nurses returning to the profession or upping their hours to full-time. This surge is being explained by nursing being a steady, good-paying job in a terrible economic climate. I know a few nurses who went back to full-time because their spouses lost their jobs or took pay cuts.
Oh - before we forget - download the LoveTel Motel MP3. It's free! Tell your friends. Sweet.
It turns out he already had a nicely formatted version. And he gave me permission to share it with you.
Nicholas Brendan as Seth, the pastry guy, tops my list for reasons to watch—I actually followed big, sweet, ol’ Xander from “Buffy” to this show. And yes, he’s basically playing the same character in a totally different setting, but that doesn’t make it bad—quite the contrary. He’s sweet, relatable, and fun to watch. And a little dose of our favorite Everyman, for people who miss said Mr. Harris. He’s also the happy medium between Stephen the British bahstahd and poor little Jimmy—manly enough by normal standards but plenty emotional and sensitive as need be. And he’s not above the wacky dating tactics that only work in sitcoms, to usually entertaining effect.
*Music: She already has this decided upon: piano. I think as part of all of her work, I will give her a tracking calendar so she can track when and how long she is spending playing piano, etc.
“Reggie has been on our radar since the beginning of free agency and is a player we think can come in and compete at safety,” general manager Marty Hurney said. “We brought him in for a visit Tuesday and it worked out. He is another player we’ve added to increase the competition.”
The plot surprised me. I have read the book one time before but I didn’t remember liking it this much. I guess I am appreciating the story that is being told more now. Hamilton throws Anita into the action and there is a lot. Violence is everywhere with scary villains and men who are supposed to be the heroes.
I have worked with asylum seekers both as a teacher and a writing mentor for many years. I have written an education resource for schools about child asylum seekers and my story, Samir Hakkim’s Healthy Eating Diary, was chosen by Tony Bradman for his anthology on child asylum seekers, Give me Shelter, Francis Lincoln, 2007.
sheet
After the area became more inflamed and tender I figured I better see a doctor. I saw a doctor yesterday afternoon who said I definitely have an infection but he was pretty sure it had not yet entered into my abdomen. He was glad I hadn't waited any longer. I'm now on a multi spectrum antibiotic for 10 days.
- I gonna get to slice you anyway, girl? - I went.
Places unseen, adventures unlived, love yet unborn.
The less you know about the contents of this book going into it, the better your reading experience will be. For CODE NAME VERITY is a truly exquisite book, one of those rare stories that will touch the heart of every reader who is fortunate enough to encounter it.
I remember being so surprised when Mistletoe Kisses was released because it's such a light green and holiday collections typically tend to feature darker greens. While I do love Mistletoe Kisses as a holiday polish, it really feels like spring when I look at my nails right now. I think this was a great choice for my St. Patty's Day mani. =)
Today of course the alleged horrors of the holocaust™ are used relentlessly as a cosh to beat back nationalistic sentiment and even within language the term Nazi has come to be a slur, yet we shall never really know if the holocaust™ as they tell it really occurred because they refuse utterly to hold an open inquiry and indeed those brave souls who question the validity of the story suffer imprisonment, physical attack and financial hardship for doing so, all of which tells me that there is more to the story that perhaps the national narrative has elements missing. Yet it serves a purpose and holocaust™ education has become big business and indeed it is a necessary requirement to feed to the young, is it any wonder then that the young on average reject nationalism when they have been taught that such thoughts and desires are thee greatest evil, certainly there must be many millions who repress perfectly normal sentiment due to such propagandist education. Of course anti-Muslim feeling is permitted as I have made plain above it serves finance for it to be so and indeed Jewry as a group profits, although officially it is not in their interest to say so.
Their conversation was constantly interrupted by people describing their ailments and asking the doctor for free medical advice.
We’ve reached the final post of my little project. This has been an interesting few weeks – in some ways I feel even closer to my faith, in other ways I have been reminded there are still a few struggles for me in the faith.
The New York Times reported today that a government watchdog group, Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington (CREW is their acronym, I suppose), has asked President Obama and Congressional leaders not to attend the National Prayer Breakfast in Washington this year. The reason? The sponsor of the event is an evangelical group called The Fellowship (aka The Family), who apparently has been tied to legislation in Uganda calling for the imprisonment and execution of homosexuals. I’ve never heard of The Fellowship, but that’s not surprising since the organization is supposedly known for its secrecy and has denied its existence in the past, which just adds to the apprehension of the crew at CREW. CREW’s boycott request isn’t the point of this post, though.
A stranger.
On the Ij, on the Ijssel
I’m a huge fan of Lee Marvin– as well as Jim Jarmusch, Tom Waits and Nick Cave. If I had the looks, this would definitely be the club for me. From the website–
perpetuated smiles
please visit these informative websites, Thank you:)
In some states where fault is still a factor in divorce proceedings (even where no-fault divorce exists, in some states there is still fault-based divorce that — when proven — can impact support or property division) an adulterous relationship can seriously reduce (or even eliminate) the obligation of one spouse to pay alimony to the unfaithful spouse regardless of need. In addition, alimony already in place is often terminated when a spouse or ex-spouse lives with another person.
Looking at Paris in black and white highlights her differences... the softness of the vegetation against the solid nature of the stone river banks.... the bridges that transition between the right and left banks... the white painted buildings of Paris against the golden stone of the Hausmannian architecture... Contrasts that get lost on a full colour day...
When life threw me, and my family, this “curve ball” of a year, we learned that we could lean into each other. I appreciate them more. I feel more vulnerable – especially since I’m having yet another birthday tomorrow – but I’m happy with what I’m doing with my life overall, and I’m looking for opportunities to be helpful to other people, whether as a consultant or as a friend.
I am grateful… and along the lines of the job thing again....I am so grateful that my husband opened his heart to the Lord and he heard what He had to say. Greg is SO certain that the Lord is going to provide for us in this transition. He is SO sure that we're going to be ok and he says he's expecting us to do BETTER. It's all perspective. I am so grateful for my husband.
Create a layout or card using the following ingredients:
The internationalism was reinforced within the realm of ideas, as liberalism and socialism became the strongest ideological forces, and conservative ideologies were on the defence.
Just one year ago, the idea of a gluten sensitivity never crossed my mind. And it probably still would not even be close to my radar if it weren't for Sara and her Asperger's diagnosis.. Her severe OCD.. Her severe ADHD.. Her out of control behavior.. I never would have taken a close look at gluten if she had not literally pushed me to the point of desperation.. To the point of being willing to try anything to have some sanity around here.. She is definitely my hero.. my savior.. my everything. Because if she had not been who she is, I would never have learned that I have Celiac disease. I would still be suffering with rashes, malabsorption, muscle pain, joint pain, constant headaches, fatigue, brain fog, etc. God only knows what other diagnoses the future held for me and everyone else in this house if Sara had not saved us. She is truly my hero!
It's okay, though; this is a parody of other science fiction films. So if we have no originality, it doesn't mean that we're actually cheating the viewer - it's subversive, so it's okay.
I’m going to present now a small list of things the Smartards have given us that serve no real purpose other than to shorten our stay in this universe.
As a proud military wife myself I greatly appreciate such an organization! You can head on over to their website to find out more in detail what it is all about, but to sum it up for you here is a quote from their site, "OPERATION SHOWER is a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization that honors the sacrifices military families make by producing and coordinating unit-wide baby showers and "showers in a box" for pregnant or expecting military families in a deployment or high stress situation".
I digress…
After the rough list is put together and finalized it is time to rewrite it onto the meal planning schedule. It seems like a lot of writing but it probably takes me 5 minutes to transfer the list and it is worth a lot more in time saved during the week. I like the layout of this form but there are other free ones online or you can make your own by hand or on the computer. The notes section comes in very handy and don't forget to write cookbook page numbers down for easy reference here too.
This lovely fairy, gently holding a pompom Chrysanthemum in her hands, makes a wonderful border for inspirational quotes and/or poems. She has been designed by Sara Burrier exclusively for Crafts and Me Stamps. You can find Chrysanthemum here.
When I wasn’t talking to people, I was constantly updating the county clerk’s website as election results were posted. At one point, Margaux had to pull out her phone charger so my phone wouldn’t die.
Needless to say, the Pear Sorbet was absolutely amazing. Nicely infused, elegant pear flavors, with a bowl painted with the crunchy pumpkin garnacha. I figured these two would work nicely together, and they did. The element that had me freaked ot a bit however was the blue cheese, but I have seen blue cheese work well in several dishes. Let me say that there are not many things I like blue cheese on, but the shocked me as the different elements together worked flawlessly. Was I disappointed in this? Oh heck no, however, there is one thing that I was disappointed in, and we'll talk about that more below!
I drew the shapes of tanks
—Anansi and the Moss-Covered Rock, Anansi Goes Fishing, Anansi and the Magic Stick, and Anansi and the Talking Melon, retold by Eric A. Kimmel and illustrated by Janet Stevens—all very funny. My favorite is Anansi and the Moss-Covered Rock: just imagine what the trickster does when he discovers a rock that knocks people off their feet when a certain phrase is said! (I will mention that I didn't like Anansi's Party Time as well as the others, which are really terrific.)
Sometimes it is best to go downstream with the flow, rather than fighting to go upstream.
Plans for More Affordable Subs
But it’s not a fairy tale I’m telling you. I’m telling you about a girl who had nowhere to go and no one she wanted to admit her stupidity to. So, it went on that way for awhile. I never believed that whole “I swear it’s the last time."
For me, a healthy diet means eating real food. It means whole milk over skim because it's less processed. It means 4% cottage cheese over 2% because it's less processed. It means avoiding words like "low fat" or "low cal" or "fat free" because that means the food has been messed with in a factory. It means focusing on fruits and vegetables for meals and snacks. It means being aware of where my meat comes from and how it has been raised.
The woman proceeds to tell me who she is and that she'd like to set up an interview with me.
When people pull this "I'm a bartender..." crap on me, I not only question if they truly are a bartender, but I can't help but wonder, what in the hell kind of bar do they actually work at?
"So can I use your shower?" I ask, He shows me where it is and gives me a towel.I take clothes in with me to avoid any awkwardness.
Game Bat
God has not change we have doubted Him. Our emotions gets the best of us and this is how the adversary is allowed in. If God says one thing, then we turn His word to fit our fleshly desires. Let us look at some examples we use to change His word. God says His will is good and perfect (Romans 12:22)- we say we could improve it. God says he is no respecter of persons; you feel he has favorites. God says ‘I will never leave you or forsake you’ (Hebrews 13:5); you feel forsaken.God says you are more than a conqueror (Romans 8:37); we feel like a weakling. God says through Jesus you are the righteousness of God (2 Corinthians 5:21); you feel unclean. God says we also rejoice in our sufferings, because we know that suffering produces perseverance, and does not disappoint (Romans 3:5); you feel your suffering is useless.
But how to keep her free from fear?
Hier möchte ich gerne mitmachen:
Rebranding part of push to streamline environmental reviews
To the confessional--
Prophecy often involves messages that have to do with the future and survival of all the lives on Earth. When prophecy is the “tool” of the message being given, the message will be “given to” several individuals. You are living in times that have been prophesied by various prophets ranging from Nostradamus, the Bible, Edgar Cayce and others like him, and by numerous Native American tribes and sources. It is the “times” that were prophesied. An example of this is seen in the prophecies of the Hopi Indians. The Hopi elders spoke about these times many generations ago. The same kinds of prophecies were spoken of in the Bible and by Cayce and others. One begins to see that these varied sources are indeed speaking about times that the evidence of the truth bears out. It has been said that the only successful prophecy is one that does not happen. This is true because so many prophecies are warnings to let people the world over know that there are dangers and perils ahead.
That depends on what your requirements are.
After the Renaissance, the Century of Lights (or Age of Enlightenment, somewhere in the XVIIIth century) made its way into the mainstream, thus people further trying to improve themselves....although if you'll take a quick look in the mirror you'll see that despite you're part of the same species that was the main protagonist in the Renaissance and Century of Lights, you're still a loser and have an L-shaped mark on your forehead. But I'm going to skip the Age of Enlightenment.
But school isn’t what I want to write about here today. What I want to write about is my neurotic fear of making a mess on the road to creativity, which I’m pretty sure is a byproduct of my schooling (don’t write in the margin, keep your feet out of the aisle, don’t chew gum, sit up straight, etc. etc. etc.)
The concert entrance is 6.30pm, within a short time period it gather up tons of people! Above is 7pm and below is almost 8pm ++. (My camera not so good in night time zzz) And the crowd almost fill up the beach side too!
There are four books. Each has its own villain and contains a complete story which is resolved, but at the same time there’s is a larger villain and over-arching story for the entire quartet. That has been great fun to work out. I don’t like series where a book just stops with a ‘to be continued’. There can be a sense of the larger story continuing, but I want that specific story to have a finite shape and resolution.
Cycling shoes
OK, first of all, a big thanks to everyone who has pre-ordered the new album. I’m so thankful to have your trust and, well, your money. For those of you who haven’t ordered yet, there’s still time. I’ll be doing pre-orders for another 7-10 days. Go here to order for a discount.
I was reading a friend’s blog this morning – and just as a frame of reference, this friend lives in Brooklyn, on the border between Prospect Heights and Crown Heights, one neighborhood heavily gentrified and the other becoming more so – and it occurred to me the “feel” that is Portland. This city that I’ve moved to is a very nice and livable city, don’t get me wrong; and it has a certain Brooklynness in its neighborhood feels, but there was also something else that I’ve felt since I’ve moved here, but I could never put my finger on it. Then, while reading his article, it suddenly dawned on me what it was.
I don't use the term indifference lightly. I find the crime of indifference to be one of humanities greatest failures. Yet, right now, I feel trapped in a world so mired in the wrong thing and so clearly choosing to do the simple thing. Sure, the average people I run into are not out there murdering people, committing violent hate crimes, neglecting children to the point of starvation. Instead I am surrounded my a lot of very busy looking people who are just trying to survive themselves in a false construct of the new "community" with out the commonality. Except of course a mass condolence of interference.
S Beam is like the NFC-based Android Beam, but also works with Wi-Fi Direct for sending large files.
I did what all great rivers do.
● Build capacities to analyze and respond to watershed risk.
As it is.
LCNV held its annual Holiday Potluck Party this past December 6, 2011. Over 250 staff, students, and supporters came together in the spirit of the holiday season, and shared a meal and conversation.
150g strawberry jam
And the meatloaf was extremely good too – delicious and saucy. We both love meatloaf, and this was very good indeed – almost as good as mine.
Mhambi is regularly struck at how the British (and probably most Westerners) misunderstand South Africa racism. I just started a new job, and over a boozy Chistmas lunch, a new colleague told me of his lovely visit to South African shores.
2) Sub-vocalize (or, better yet, read out loud).
Something that emerged yesterday. A silver BMW 5 Series registered in S’bu Ndebeles name has a fine for 250km/h on the N1 North in Jozi in July 2010. Yes, 250km/h. What.the.fuck!
There is so much going on this week. First off, if you are taking Laura's class, the class will get started around 11:15. Please bring your own Copic markers, inks and stamps if you have them. The class will run faster if you have some of the supplies.
Seriously Leo?? Little brat! I'll read it while you're sleeping... Or I'll read it to you! that'll work!
Which type of wild salmon should I purchase? Which is best, both for me and for the environment?
Your body is firm and inviting
Pour the rolled oats in the food processor and chop until finely ground. Remove the pit of the medjool dates, and chop them with a knife. Add piece by piece to the ground oatmeal flour (so that they distribute better). Process long enough that the mix starts to get sticky. Now add the remaining ingredients, and processes until the mix comes together (quite a sticky dough). Take small portions and roll them between your hands in a ball like shape. Store in the fridge! Enjoy!
“In light of the board’s history of consistently denying requests for commutations, my impression is that a hearing in my case would be nothing short of a dog and pony show,” Kemp wrote.
Initially it suited everyone to enjoy Balotelli’s every caper. Whilst City sat on top of the Premier League, his behaviour was tolerated. However, now eight points behind United, someone must take the blame for a remarkable implosion.
The fireworks are going off outside.
Also, I am about done with Flower Patch. I needed to decide if I was going to leave it this way or add the WDW (Weekes Dye Works) Mascara to the center area around the flowers. Well yesterday while home waiting for the dog to poop, I decided to fill it in. I am about half done and ran out of floss, but hope to have the finished photo for you soon.
For auld lang syne, my dear
I have asked lots of people if they have read it and it seems the answer is actually no and those who have tend to be men, in all honesty I’d say it is much more of a male book then a female book unless you are into Freudian psychology.
Deion is back home and in considerable better shape than me. He woke up after a pretty rough time feeling okay, and lets be honest, pretty high on drugs. I think that the hospital should give us parents some of those drugs while we are bedside waiting for good news...it certainly would have saved me about three heart attacks, a stroke and half a head of hair!!!
“American exceptionalism” is the belief that a 200+ year-old parchment in the National Archives has magical powers to somehow guarantee limited government from 1% tyranny, despite the specific and clear warnings of the US Founders, despite world history of repeated oligarchic/1% tyranny claiming to be for the “good of the people,” and despite US history’s descent into vicious psychopathy (short version here: US war history in 2 minutes) hidden in plain view with paper-thin corporate media propaganda.
At the absolute least, it will achieve Pete Townsend's minute continued keyboard solos added tolerable in the game!
Happy Tuesday!! :-)
Argentina's Patricio Garino, Greece's Kyprianos "Paris" Maragkos and Alexandria-native Kethan Savage signed National Letters of Intent last week, marking the first recruiting class of the Lonergan era. They will join Isaiah Armwood, a Baltimore-native who transferred from Villanova this off-season and will take the floor as a junior in 2012-13.
... and with that Nicole logged off and decided to not talk to Andrew anymore.
As I have mentioned before, we live in a tiny little town that is 26 miles away from where we do all of these things. We have one long highway that can get boring for Nevaeh, so she will usually watch a movie on her car dvd player. I turned on my music...Mandisa always blesses me as I drive. The first few songs, I was alone in my praise and worship time and then suddenly....the song "Shackles" came on and my little girl did something I've NEVER known her to do. She turned OFF her movie and listened as the song played. Not only did she listen....she started dancing and throwing her hands in the air.
Enjoyable though the experience undoubtedly was, I have made a mental note to ensure that, when I consult my diary for Sundays in May 2010, I will discover that I am due to be watching television.
Under 16 Weekend with camping Full-£80 Discount-£75
The same syndrome was reflected in the poor police response in the hours after the 22/7 attacks.
If I hear "Wall Street versus Main Street" one more time, I may vomit.
How I've barely spent any time at home, but now I have until the 30th to just hang with friends.
Examining the Body
We are celebrating the 40 years of Westwood and this is a fitting way to celebrate this year.
My kiddie names.
1. Horizontal Pull / Vertical Push: Seated Cable Rows/ DB Military Press
this course last year. We believe this reflects UBC’s core values: academic
Here's a preview..... its still a work in progress but its coming along nicely :D don't forget to click the pictures to make them bigger :)
- Sarah, Sussex, 28/3/2012 07:48
Only in New York is there such witty banter
Erich Von Stroheim La Grande Illusion
you make it difficult ,in your groups
3. "They all want me as a friend or a fuck. I'm worshiped at Westerburg and I'm only a junior."
This notion started me thinking about how we are made, and Psalm 139:14 popped into my mind. ‘I praise you because I am fearfully and wonderfully made’. When one thinks about it, are we all not ‘wonderfully made’ indeed? Despite our mortality, we are, after all, capable of rational thought, deep emotion and accomplishing complex tasks.
Tell someone you love them today.
if a species disappears before it is discovered, was it ever really there?
Angel and Demons are a lethal combination right now in the paranormal YA genre, one that I've had a really tough time getting into. If it isn't shallow main characters, creepy stalker love interests who stare at their beloved, poor plot lines, or even down right crappy writing. Unearthly by Cynthia Hand is the first YA Angel book I've actually loved and I was craving another fix. Good thing Guardian was waiting for me!
Isn’t it nice that the Traditions are there to remind us how to behave toward others? It would be easy to slip into the misunderstanding that we exist just to commiserate with others who share our compulsion. Nothing could be farther from the truth. We are not a diet and calories club, neither are we a community of commiseration. We are a fellowship of spiritual recovery from a three-fold disease, the primary symptom of which is compulsive overeating. (Let the addict of other media substitute his/her substance here.) Unified behind the purpose of service and directing that service at a target, we know we will find usefulness when we properly employ ourselves to that end. It is in voluntarily giving ourselves to others that we recover from the debilitating habit of self-service.
Guess what happened next?
- J and his housemates are not alone in this, Nottingham Solidarity
When you go deep enough to the formless, the dreadful is no longer dreadful, it’s sacred. Then you will experience the two levels, when somebody dies who is close to you. Yes it’s dreadful on the level of form. It’s sacred on the deeper level. Death can enable you to find that dimension in yourself. You’re helping countless other humans if you find that dimension in yourself – the sacred dimension of life. Death can help you find the sacred dimension of life – where life is indestructible.
The giveaway I mentioned is at Green Fairy Quilts. This is one of my favorite online fabric shops, and the one I check first. They always have great deals and sales, and until Monday you have a chance to win a fat eighth bundle of Breakfast at Tiffany's (gasp!) or a $30 gift card to the online store (for the most referrals). I am sure I will not be able to refer too many people, but if you do happen to head that way, mention me :)
Not sure we'll ever know definitively which show was which, unless someone who attended both shows pipes up some point.
Ps: The red-bow-ponytail remainds me of my elementry school years.
Victorians have always fascinated me, especially the Victorian Generals. Most people have an image of them as a set of stuffed shirts, pretentious and hypocritical. They have faded into history and as our imperial history is no longer taught and a milksop revisionist version put into place to placate. The PC brigade. If I mentioned Napier, Campbell, Havlock, Gough, Hope Grant and Sir Harry Smith, would anyone know who I was taking about, I very much doubt it. The life story of everyone of these reads like an unbelievable fairytale. These were the successful ones, the ones that retired with a Baronetcy and a pension, most though lay buried and forgotten in far corner of an empire that most Brits have been taught to despise and feel embarrassed about. John Nicholson is one of the later types he lies buried in Delhi where he died at the age of 34 leading an assault on the city during the Indian mutiny or the first war of Indian independence as the politically correct like to refer to it. He is for me perhaps the most interesting of all the Victorian Generals and one wonders how far he would have risen and what feat he would have performed if he had lived.
And then it hit me. When I retire, and we move back to the hills of my ancestral home, I will need something to do to keep me busy. And I have the perfect enterprise, one that can't possibly fail to succeed in that environment. And then, as I was fantasizing about this, I realized that in the recent name game we had here for giveaway day, I had the perfect name. So, in about 20 years, you'll all be able to find me in Tennessee. Just look for the billboards.
What do you think?! Not bad, eh? Especially for my first hat/beanie!!
“Do they think we’re somebody famous?” our fellow Brit traveler asked.
Queen and Co. Pearls
We will do a drawing at the end the month. This Challenge will be entered to win a Scrappy Moms Stamps stamp set of your choice. You have until Monday 5/7 to link your entry below. We hope you have fun with this challenge!
Azalea Med. I have used one of Lady Shuttle Maker's
menace, heaviness.
We toured the school after hanging out for most of the morning with nothing in particular to do. We were invited by admissions to eat in the dining hall for $7.50 each, which we did. We sat amongst students and faculty eating, and noticed a variety of seating options that we had not seen before: single tables, like desks, in long rows that swivel toward a giant TV screen, and long and round, tall bar tables and seats placed in different areas around the cheerful and new dining hall. I ate a Mongolian stir-fry, new and popular campus cuisine (it was also touted at F&M) and the kids ate pizza as part of their survey of to find which campus has the best. F&M is currently in the lead but Juniata is not in the running as we did not lunch on campus there.
An hour later, I left the restaurant and headed uptown to the Starbucks they were meeting at. As I entered, I saw him sitting at a raised bar in the window, at a barstool next to a blonde. She was chewing fluorescent green gum like it had somehow done her wrong, and she wanted it to suffer. It sat there, wedged in her teeth when she spoke, otherwise, it was being brutally masticated, mouth open as she chewed. Yuck.
Place the cake mixture into prepared pan by alternating spoonfuls of plain batter with chocolate batter. Using a skewer, swirl the batter to get marbled effect.
I accomplished my cum files (do you call them that?!) and half my report cards today.
Suffolk Trading Standards is issuing the following advice and guidance:
I started dating Julie Iaci, a girl from a different high school. She was kind, she was sweet but I think I got on her nerves. We’re still great friends today.
It was said he was the first person in Europe to have an Apple Mac (Stephen Fry being the second). He was script editor of Doctor Who from 1978 to 1979 during Tom Baker’s craziest period (the two of them hit it off so well they encouraged the most ludicrous behavior in each other). He wrote three Doctor Who stories, including one of the best ever, ever, ever, ‘City of Death’, set in Paris, about an alien who steals the Mona Lisa and gets Leonardo to knock up a few copies in the past so he can sell them to private buyers in the present to fund his experiments. Genius! His fingerprints are all over the other stories of that era of the programme.
I did manage to get other things done today, such as removing the last of the outdoor Christmas decorations that don’t involve climbing up onto the roof. Also I went to my kids music lessons. normally I sit outside for the half hour, but today my son’s piano teacher asked me to come in. I might want to regret the lost writing time, but it would only have netted me an extra three or four pages and that wouldn’t have been enough to make a difference.
MEN.
Karl: There were these two fellars standin’ on a bridge, a-goin’ to the bathroom. One fellar said, “The water’s cold” and the other fellar said, “The water’s deep”. I believe one fella come from Arkansas. Get it?
to divide
Also, on another side note, Quinoa is great as a healthy breakfast. Let me know if you try this or if you have any other Quinoa recipes that you like! I'd like to try more.
Younger princelings are often seen among the models, actors and sports stars who gather at a strip of nightclubs by the Workers’ Stadium in Beijing to show off Ferraris, Lamborghinis and Maseratis. Others have been spotted talking business over cigars and vintage Chinese liquor in exclusive venues such as the Maotai Club, in a historic house near the Forbidden City.
Your brewing method of choice is also very important. Most coffee purists (including myself) will tell you that the best way to brew coffee is by using an immersion method of brewing. Unlike conventional drip brewing methods, the coffee grounds are mixed into the hot water and then filtered out. This gives the coffee the highest possible water to coffee exposure possible.
Yep that's right folks....after nearly 3 months I am put fingers to keyboard lol
Skin: Glam Affair – Leah Natural – 01 Red
While we alternated munching on burritos and sucking chocolate chip goodness, Josh and I talked about things but more so, I did some thinking. Today was my day off and it being so, I had the chance to peruse the web (and my favourites folder for things I had favourited ages ago because they looked interesting and I didn’t have the time to look at them in-depth) in search of new recipes and the like (read: new utensils for the kitchen, how I would like to model my kitchen when I am older, etc). In my search I came across a few things I would like to try making as soon as possible…
Its been a while since Ive posted a food post! Food is something that is very up and down for me. I have a love hate relationship with it. Im a sucker for things like chocolate chip cookies, and also for being a procrastinator and waiting until I need something quick quick! So on days where my head is very much into my work, which is most days, I tend to not eat so great. Ill just grab some seaweed chips and artichoke dip and have that for lunch. May not sound all that bad, but its definitely not a very balanced diet when I do that. But, when Im on a good train track with food, I love it. I enjoy preparing food for the most part, I just never allot myself enough time to do so. The other day we had a family get together at my Nanna's and my aunt brought the simplest cucumber tomato salad and I fell in love with it. It was so easy to make, took just a few minutes and I had enough to eat for 3 days!
“Fixating on enjoyment in the adolescent years: Using developmental psychological theories to communicate with the modern man”
The people who have payday advance debts basically fit in with decrease or middle class households. They get palm to jaws earnings or any level of debts sounds extremely enormous for the children. Specially, whether it is a brief time period money advance, your credit card debt may perhaps surge very quickly due to excessive apr. The consumers from time to time are so irritated that they even get ready to try Bankruptcy as being a answer because of their financial obligations. Nevertheless, the matter of fact is that regardless of how intense your credit card debt issue is there’s nevertheless a fix for doing it with debt consolidation reduction mortgage.
You know how important that everyone pre-book their transfer due to very high demand on local services. That way, you can avoid any difficulty or time delays getting to your lungs - you can view the airline tickets student discount, the airline tickets student rates and stress by ensuring a safe onward journey by using reliable holiday transfers.
*This dressing made enough for 6 individual salads.
I handheld the camera pointing it at the windows. The shutter speed was 8 seconds. Jon stood in front of the window for about 3 seconds and then quickly ducked down making a creepy ghost-like figure appear in the window. (We didn't show the kids this picture, btw. We didn't want to be up all night with them. :) )
cannot make
The yarn was pretty luxurious for what I usually use. No mail order this time. It's a 10 ply aran weight, 50% Peruvian Wool, 30% Super Fine Alpaca, and 20% Silk. It has a thick and thin consistency (I don't know what this is called), which makes it very forgiving and I like the way the leaves ended up looking kind of rounded instead of triangle shape like the pattern picture. On the other hand, the yarn is a bit heavy so it doesn't sit fluffy on the head. Even though I only used about a ball and a half, the project ended up costing about $20 as it was $10 per ball. But I wanted something really nice.
Whether this will spread worldwide to affect kitchens in Helminthdale is yet undetermined. In the meantime, what can we do except huddle together in this lifeboat, at the mercy of the powers that be?
Reporting from a meeting of the Organization of American States (OAS),
Dear Fans of the Kangaroo, I have returned with a renewed sense of optimism. The last few days have involved the wrapping up of the semester and tonight will be the tying of the bow that is graduation. I'll have continued work over the summer for the reading series and for the academic journal that I edit, but all of this is manageable. What I'm looking at now is six weeks of what should be fairly steady writing time. I resolve to make the most of it as July will bring two brief excursions out of state with family and friends and August the return to school.
The Partnership for Patients brings together leaders of major hospitals, employers, health plans, physicians, nurses, and patient advocates along with State and Federal governments in a shared effort to make hospital care safer, more reliable, and less costly. Large hospital systems like Ascension Health have demonstrated major reductions in birth trauma.
Sorry the color chart wouldn't post below. It showed up in the edit, but not in the published post. Oh well, I'll probably use Valspar anyway because they have prettier colors. I am trying not to go too spray paint happy around the house, but I already have 4 separate projects to do (yikes!).
Please check for the buyer reviews and ratings of 8′ ROUND Area Rug. Bright Gumball Pink carpet. 37 oz TWISTED SHAG FRIEZE Very THICK, PLUSH and LUXURIOUS. Many sizes and 20 vibrant “mod” colors to choose from. in the merchant’s website by visit the link below.
Olivier said he drove into a driveway and out again as he made a U-turn. A marked police van suddenly stopped in front of the couple’s Toyota Run-X.
1 teaspoon yellow mustard
The short story's final twist - won't spoil it - is good. Let me tell you now, you don't receive the same sense of surprise when you see the movie's corresponding ending scene, primarily because of this inversion of POV, man to woman, old to young, sleeper to watcher. In fact there is no surprise at all in the movie: that person was doomed from dinner time.
the emperor of the Holy Roman Empire?
When the enemy comes knocking at your door... it's disconcerting if you aren't ready for it. My kids really rallyed around me too... they were saying things that just really boggled my mind... they were so insightful, and grown up in their views... it was thrilling to hear them say things that most 45 years old don't grasp.
1 cigars
Duane Ensing - I like to keep up with several digital blogs and magazines, both garden and architectural, but also mix it up with unrelated industries to see if some new seed can be sown as a launching pad for my imagination. I love the surprises that emerge out of the mind.
I unfortunately believe that the result of their fate is one in the same, but i am starting to become more and more disturbed by Sierra’s mothers statements, demeanor and especially interview with Nancy Grace… check it out and you will see what i am talking about….
It cannot corrode faith.
1952-53 Tales of Tomorrow (writer) Episodes: "The Glacier Giant" (5 December 1952): "Mr. Fish" aka "The Discovered Heart": (16 January 1953): “Two Faced” (30 January 1953): "The Evil Within" (1 May 1953 - brief appearance by James Dean)
with my Hubby!!!!!... swoon...
So he brushed off his boots and he put down his pouch
Feeche is working hard to get stuff done before the end of May. As it is he'll be gone for a week in April, and once late may hits, he'll be traveling and going to camps.
May my dears sleep in peace!
I was sure these parents were off their nut, and equally sure that their kids were going to grow up to be, oh, I don't know... Deficient. Crippled. Damaged.
I've tried a variety of palettes and my favorite is the grey disposable palette, I like that I can write directly on the paper with a sharpie. For a while I saved those palettes because there were important notes I liked to reference. Well, that soon became a pile of papers that was difficult to flip through and I eventually trashed it all, including my notes. I just happened to have an extra moleskine and realized that would be the most perfect place to include color studies and my notes. So two fruitful things this summer, limiting individual painting time and recording my color studies and notes in a more organized manner. What did you learn this summer while painting?
I asked him how things were going and if he was happy, and he said they were good- he is happy, but…
It would seem that in addition to its other lunacies, San Francisco is definitely a no-go area for anyone wishing to sing patriotic songs — even in the privacy of someone’s home.
Remembering sweet Kṛṣṇa (Mādhava) floods me to the core.
Oh and if you are interested in making your own just let me know so I can make a proper tutorial and upload the templates. I definitely recommend it, it was crazy easy.
* Bake in pre-heated oven at 180 deg C for 15 mins or until golden brown (if necessary, tent the surface with foil if the top browns too quickly closer to the baking time). Remove from oven and transfer to wire track to let cool. once cool, store immediately in an airtight container.
But having had my therapeutic stomp, do I THEN dive straight into the manuscript or writing a snotty letter? No, no, and no, Dear Readers. I leave it at least another day before I look at the letter or notes again. I know some authors who leave it a week. You have to give your brain enough time to get over any initial knee-jerk reaction that you had so that when you read those notes or that letter a second time, you see what the editor actually wrote, rather than what your offended ego or eager-to-please nature is telling you is there.
19-Miracle Cure
Randy Orton and Kane are having the “We Have Nothing Better for You Two Right Now” match of the night! Nothing against either competitor but I have no interest in this match and I don’t really care who wins as it will do nothing to change their positions within the WWE. Apparently Kane has to beat Orton to prove that the monster is back (yeah, ok – wouldn’t ohhhh, I don’t know, BREAKING ZACK RYDER’S BACK DO THAT?!?) and Orton just wants to RKO the big guy because he’s a viper or apex predator, or rattlesnake or something. Like I said I don’t really care.
Sentiment: Computer generated and punched with a Stampin' Up Paper Savers punch
This romance
"Jesus loves me this I know.
Just how do I know this? Well mostly because it’s Kathi. And also because she has started with a bang and I mean a bang!
Wow, that flew by too fast.
Funds maintains a crucial spot in your lifetime. From time to time insufficient required income making you cannot pay out even your interim requires. In the meantime, your problematic credit rating creates your complaint additional deteriorate. But here without the need of credit check payday cash advances have presented you a chance to fulfill your short-term requires with financial angle. Together with the payday cash advances, you get recognition because of the energy and rewards. This can help to people acquiring adverse credit report.
Her stunning birthday cake card was a sure winner!
4. “The Fund shall be a mandatary of the State.”
he ascended into heaven,
On January 19, the programme for experts included:
This might come as a shock: I’m crazy about breakfast tacos. The eggs and whatever (maybe just barbacoa) filling a slightly spongy, warm flour tortilla preparation is my preferred morning meal. Breakfast tacos where you don’t expect them are even better, which led me to the Mixing Bowl Bakery.
To make this Monday better, though, one of one newest followers gave me an award!!!
Not in struggling to preserve
“Laura. The truth needs to be told. She will find out eventually.”
Information Minister Firdous Ashiq Awan described the resolution as part of a “dirty conspiracy”.
- 3 cups bread flour
Whatever you're doing, have a great weekend!
Turned around to find Fai (He looks more interested in looking at the mirror instead of the camera..)! Took another photo! Smiley face*
Can I say it? Ladies, you are awesome! I really appreciate that you're following me and that you leave comments on the posts that interest you. It's very encouraging to know that other people are reading. Thank you all so much! At the end of this entry, there will be a small change of plans concerning the giveaway some of you have entered. :) So stay tuned!
I found out about Stormdancer on the recent Dystopian Domination 2 hosted by Kai of Amaterasu Reads and Precious of Fragments of Life. According to Jay "People call STORMDANCER a Japanese Steampunk novel, but it’d be less like lying to say that Stormdancer is Japanese-inspired." Read the whole Guest Post here. After reading that Guest Post I just need to read this book! I'm an Asian so I guess I can relate to this. Japan has been one of the countries I want to go someday and I think this book makes me one step closer to it. Fans of this book you have to wait 5 months more before this awesome book hit the shelves! Stormdancer comes out September 1st.
As the player progress from screen to screen (as one is want to do in a sidescroller), she will occasionally have to fight a battle, which is pretty standard stuff for the genre. The player’s performance is evaluated at the end of the battle and depending on how quickly the battle ended and how much damage the player received a certain amount of spirit points will be awarded. Spirit points are used to craft new swords as well as level up characters. While most of the random encounters are not too difficult, there’s a persistent challenge to do as well as possible so as to get the maximum reward for one’s efforts, which is a nice incentive to take every battle seriously. The boss battles are nothing short of jaw dropping in terms of both animation and gameplay. The bosses require not only a well thought out battle plan but also a nice stock of restorative items. While I have noticed some people playing without items, they are extremely useful the first time through the game and have saved me from death on more than one occasion. One of the cooler features of Muramasa is the ability to cook food that your player can then use to restore health and gain useful abilities. It also made me hungry for rice balls and tofu…
On this day, 17 May, she died in my arms after having fought rampaging cancer for a few weeks. The woman who gave me the gift of life. There is no denying, all I am, I owe to my mother's love and she will always and forever be in my heart.
Accessories: Oval Scallop Frame Die Cut, Scallop Edge Punch, Scallop Circle Punch, 1-3/8" Circle Punch, Large Basic Pearl Jewels, Basic Pearl Jewels, Quickie Glue Pen, Paper Snips and Dimensionals
And the "inherent difficulty of building in the most densely settled city in America," while undeniable, shouldn't be seen in a vacuum. Forest City Ratner and its government partners agreed to avoid the city's Uniform Land Use Review Procedure, which would have conveyed more legitimacy and staved off some community opposition.
As a result, I have decided to recount the ordeal in a multiple installment piece entitled, The Great Migration. What’s with all the grandiose wording and dramatic presentation? Well… there’s a very good reason for it so read on for Part I: Preparing to Leave Germany and see for yourselves.
That alone seems to be a difficult point for both sides to resolve, however. Ms. Ambiga said the easiest way for the authorities to handle the problem is to simply lift the barriers to Merdeka Square – but that’s likely a move too far for Malaysia’s cautious leaders.
Tae Moo reminds him of the family’s structure. Uncle is an illegitimate son of their grandfather – which means there is no blood-relation between CEO Grandma and Tae Moo. In fact, Tae Moo has never called her Grandma. Tae Yong is the only grandson of CEO Grandma. So, the company is Tae Yong’s matters.
Rachel's dad looked to Rachel for help as if they were allies. She decided to just play along. "A serving bowl," she explained.
The Traveling Teapot has been anxiously awaiting an adventure,
8. Any Colour You Like 8:37
Is it true should be something that we are always making sure of. Too many people share things that they do not know to be true which is gossip and as we all know, gossip makes a mess and damages lives.
The one I’d definitely snap up is the offer on Sainsbury’s Blanc de Blancs (*****) an elegant all-Chardonnay champagne which has been made for them for a while by the reputable house of Duval Leroy. It’s normally £16.99, currently reduced to £14.99 and down to £11.24 if you buy 6 or more bottles (which needn’t all be champagne).
Reviewing the books I read will get my name out there, especially to readers of my genre.
A few fingers had also found their way between her legs, which she removed as quickly as she dropped her smile.
Riding to the city and on Lake Shore Drive today to escape the craziness of the Frankfort Fall Festival that I will partake in this weekend. I will also be comitting the heinous crime of riding in a non-matching kit today. I will probably even be guilty of turning my arm warmers inside out just so they match the white on my jersey. Yeah, I know, lame. But, it's all in the name of the Euro Cycling rules. Actually I break about 99.9% of their rules, first off by riding Shimano components. My socks are too short. I don't wear full kits. I don't have logos on my frame. The list goes on and on and on. (Thanks, Sig.) Oh well.
1 can beans, kidney, black, your choice, drained & rinsed
Here's what August 13-17 looks like for our family:
2Pac - 40
2) Some people are mean. They feel it’s their right – dare I say responsibility – to tell you that you’re a crappy writer, that your piece is plagiarized, that you’re adding more crap to the Internet (these are the comments that he left). Ouch, bro. I should give you directions to my house so you can kick my dog and rip up my unedited, crappy manuscript. Thank you for your constructive criticism, dude, I’ll keep your thoughts in mind every time I write now.
In the meantime, I keep deveining things over here in an attempt to figure out the recipe for landing a writing job. I’m afraid it might be this:
This was the highest mileage week on my training schedule - not just to date, but the whole thing.
An abandoned dock around the cove seemed like the perfect backdrop. Lauren did not disappoint. She made it come to life:
The Challenge is to Create a Card/Project based on any of Terry Gilliam's Work.
Next, we worked through some issues with our donor and found out that although he does want to move out of the area, it may not end up being as immediate or as far away as we were originally told. Basically, he and his boyfriend don’t know what they are doing yet but they had made grandiose announcements of packing it all up and whisking away very fast without talking to us first and that was pretty devastating. We told them they really need to please just communicate with us more so we’re not caught so off-guard. We concluded that they’ll probably end up being around for at least the next 3 months. I hope. No promises there.
Recently. It can yearn and ache and
On the one hand, it's obvious that you enjoyed my pasta, my homemade pasta which pleases me immensely and then you go and say that I look like Dr Friggin' Crippen? The ragu gets a stellar 9.5 rating on the richter scale but then you infer that "nothing much is proved" and that quite possibly I have got someone else to cook your rWMPC meal?! Furthermore you dare to suggest that Essex Eating Dan and I are one and the same person??!! You actually think I am related to that hairy oaf???!!!
I didn't need to go through my shoes as I had purged some pairs not long ago. They just needed a tidy up. My youngest son just loves grabbing my shoes and throwing them around our robe. It seems like its a great source of entertainment for him but more work for me.
And its indeed a beautiful day!
the collision of the con-
Authors should be aware that this form of binding is not the familiar perfect binding used on standard paperbacks, and combined with the maximum page count of 28, makes this offer seem pretty excessive.
Come to me, all of you who are tired and have heavy loads, and I will give you rest.
I was thrilled to discover how quick and easy it is to make homemade cocoa mix. It offers the ease and convenience of the store bought packets, but tastes much better. After much trial and error, here is the recipe that I came up with. Enjoy!
Audio excerpt taken from “Prayer”: talks given by Llewellyn Vaughan-Lee, June 2011 at the Omega Institute. To listen to complete talks please visit: goldensufi.org/​audio.html#Omega_2011
This was a highlight of my day. Melissa put some light makeup on her face (which made her feel special) and straightened her hair. Plus, she was wearing the birthday dress Isabelle picked out a month ago.
a) Why on earth did you sue Luke Woollard then??? If you knew that his father owned the boat then why did you not sue his father for having an uninsured boat?? The accident is his responsibility, he’s probably doing exactly as his parents have taught him – taking responsibility for his actions. If you’re out to get money then you don’t rob the poor. YOU KEEP ON ASSUMING THINGS. Did you not pay attention when you were being told that “to assume is to make an ASS out of U and ME”?
Capsicum, Red and Orange
White Horse – Taylor Swift
The effects are pure Corman kitsch - for the early Sixties, there are some interesting visuals thanks to John Howard and an effect called Spectarama, where things are seen through Xavier's eyes as clothing, skin, membrane, musculature, skeletons, building walls and the very fabric of the universe gets peeled away before our own eyes. And while the effects succeed in giving us visions that we have never seen (for cheap, presumably), they also make us realize that a movie like X: The Man With X-Ray Eyes is about more than the effects.
Port A, I think, is of two minds. It appears to want to embrace the beach tourism dollahs, and yet still keep its "sleepy fishing village" ethos. Generally, it's still a pretty charming place, and the growth, while evident, appears to be moving very slowly.
Spring onion - 4 nos, finely sliced
Check out what one Tea party group is being forced to do:
MRN: I don’t usually work with bright colours when I’m working for clients ( as a freelance illustrator), but I seem to be drawn to them while creating these posters. I just work by instinct and then I realise that I’m really into aqua or pink or red! I have been making a more concerted effort to create posters in more muted tones just to see what mood I can create with colour combinations I don’t usually work with.
I’d like to think that I have no fucking ego when it comes to anything I do, but I can’t even enter a writing contest without hoping that I will be, hands down, the winner and supreme champion. Even if my friends are entering the same contest, I want to be the one who shines. A good friend of mine reminded me of this tonight.
Zombies of Mass Destruction - I managed to watch the entire 89 minutes of this movie. I even had a bonafide ’laugh out loud’ moment when the first zombie attacked without warning, fantastic. But other than that, it was pretty terrible. But isn’t that what a good zombie flick is all about?
So amazingly proud of him!
(P.s. Thank you all for your support and encouragement and love. I have not been able to answer any of your comments on my last couple of posts because it’s painful, but know that they have meant a world to me. Thanks♥)
In November last year it was being reported in The Star that South African hospitals are becoming places for dying -- instead of healing. In June this year, it was reported that our cemeteries were filling up so rapidly that upright funerals were being contemplated to save space. Still, Aids is not being spoken about at our funerals, and the silence and utterly unscientific public statements about HIV-Aids from Mbeki's continue unabated while our people are dying.
Random: Why do you like fantasy so much?
Needless to say, by the third hit, the boy had closed his eyes and lost consciousness. It’s not my temper. It’s not my fault. I just cannot stand people who cannot appreciate beauty. It still boggles my mind that some people are about as deep as a puddle of rainwater.
we will lose … if we sit and wonder
“Wait!” I stopped mid-stride.
The grain profile of the recipe was different from most of the Saisons I've brewed in the past. The grain bill consisted mainly of Maris Otter British pale as the main ingredient. Smaller quantities of the following malts were used: Weyerman Munich, Weyermann Rye Malt, Weyermann Vienna Malt, Simpson Crystal 75, and a "skosh" of Castle Aromatic Malt. The color is close to 16 HCU (~10 SRM). At the end of the boil, I included the zest of 1.5 large Navel oranges, and the zest of 1 small white grapefruit. Black Malabar pepper and Grains of Paradise were also added. IBU was 27, and I used Styrian Goldings and Saaz hops.
On the basis of this parenthesis elements of the popular culture as well as the art world could be seen as national in the fifties, and rock and roll could be seen as a foreign threat, although much of the cultural elements it was threatening had originally been just as foreign.
Pictures Step by Step
My almost 25 year old son came home last night with good news: he's landed a summer job as a barista at a popular coffee cafe in our resort mountain town. This is after months of looking somewhat fruitlessly at similar, less appealing positions. This is what many college educated kids are doing in this recession; not to mention living at home.
6 march - Fri Son - Fribourg, Switzerland
I found several large groupings of bugs and murderously poured large amounts of the dust on their little buggy heads. They, instead of following the script and politely keeling over, frolicked in the “snow” and laughed at me.
See Za? She is having so much fun, surrounded by her books. She is 'reading' them, which thrills me as a mommy-teacher. She is in one of the first stages of reading, yay! So while I think that, the other mommy side of me thinks, "she should take one or two out, put it back, and then get more." The root of this worry is that I don't want my kids to be dependent people who rely on others to clean after them.
So, we got the marshmallows out! Experimenting with food is always fun!
As of tonight I am challenging myself to keep my phone and laptop out of the bedroom. I’ll plug in my forgotten alarm clock and draw some much-needed personal boundaries. If the American Sleep Association says that the bed is for sleep and sex only, then who am I to argue?
The Atlantic Book Awards and Festival will be held May 10-17, 2012, comprising of numerous free events in all Canadian Atlantic provinces, and will culminate with an awards ceremony on May 17 in Newfoundland.
‘We’ve buried you near Dumbledore,
Seems a shame to waste them.
Hi! I’m finally back to my DT work after a long break for my trip to Utah; plus, I had to take an extra week off because I had a horrible migraine with lots of nausea last week. I think I willed it away all while I was in Utah and the day after I got home—bammo!!! Worst I’ve had but I’m all better now and ready to get back in the swing of things.
04: Satellite - 3:36
2. I've emptied my vacuum bag into the trash and reused it.
on to the checkered board
- Booster Draft
from the T-A-B website:
Kumarakom is one of the popular backwater spots in Kerala located in proximity of Koyattam city in backdrop of Vembanad Lake, the largest fresh water lake in Kerala. Blessed with variety of flora and fauna and an excellent backwater networks, the place is home of many exciting species of birds. It also receives large numbers of migratory birds as well. Houseboat stay is the most exciting way to explore the nature splendor of Kumarakom. On your boat cruise in Kumarakom, you will also visit many remote places that only can be explored through the backwaters network as well.
They all come running when Mom yells it's time to eat! :)
Singing them vibrant lullabies
Macabre is made up of ominous tracking shots, mist-covered cemeteries, and a plot that refuses to let up. Robert keeps searching in places he shouldn’t. Lucy continues to mentally dominate her mother. Jane retreats further and further into fantasy.
Most religious traditions, at key points in their histories, are confronted with questions over the role of marriage and sexuality in spiritual life. Some (Theravada Buddhism, Catholicism, Shakerism, etc.) see sex as leading away from God and treat asceticism and celibacy as an ideal. Other groups (ancient Judaism, Islam, some Reformation-era Anabaptists, etc.) endorse marriage, even in plural forms, as spiritually healthy. A few groups (Tantrism, Jacob Frank's sect, etc.) have gone as far as to teach free love or other forms of extramarital sexuality as having spiritual utility.
My best friend, Shady Lady, and I had a play date today. Well, the kids had a play date, and she and I had a knitting date. I love these afternoons, as we really get a chance to talk... not just chit chat. We have actual meaningful conversations. I tell her things I don't tell anyone else (well, maybe my other best friend), and I know I will always be heard and understood.
The short of it goes something like this:
She has counted six, and over,
The affair started with an unpublished paper penned by Peter Arcidiacono, Kenneth Spenner, and Esteban Aucejo. (Arcidiacono and Spenner are professors at Duke.) The paper used Duke’s own data to show that groups of students who receive preferential treatment in the admissions process (African-Americans and “legacy” admittees) disproportionately migrate from more difficult (science and engineering) to easier (liberal arts) majors.
The BBC also ran a shocking exposé on allegations of forced sterilization of women in Uzbekistan. In the report, an unnamed government official made the link between reducing fertility rates and the MDGs.
Eddie: (pause) I'm...ticklish.
John 6:40 (NIV) “For my father’s will is that everyone who looks to the Son and believes in him shall have eternal life…
Why hasn't there been some great revelation to me regarding 'why'..why aren't you here with me??Why am I not a better person because of it? What was gained by you dying? Lily looks at your picture all of the time and will say baby sissy or baby ella..it pisses me off that she will never know you.. you will never know her.. you both are little diva's.. you would have given us a run for our money together.. your poor brother would be at both of your mercy.. He still sleeps on your pillow, its beautiful and so sad at the same time.. almost 3 years later and I am still struggling to get back to me.. I need to get back there somehow..even with losing you.. I just need to feel more...normal? more like I use to.. I don't know.. I just know that I need to feel more...something..I seriously can't believe this is still my life.. with all that I have, I still feel incomplete.. and quite frankly..that pisses me off..
“We will all say wrong things at times. I feel since he has already apologized, there is no need to blow up the matter. We want to prove we are not ‘dogs’ and don’t keep ‘biting’ on it (不要像狗一样咬着不放”). We should let the matter rest with a magnanimous heart.”
cheese;
10. In Your Face
‘What the hell?’ Rook tried to kick her legs free but she was held too tight. ‘He only spoke for an hour! How has he got so much of a hold on you? Are you that devoid of entertainment?’
This skirt would pair beautifully over leggings during cooler weather or for more tom-boyish play. It can be worn either longer in a more traditional manner or at shorter lengths over leggings or tights for growing girls to enjoy for several delightful seasons.
“Sorry to call you in on your day off, Mandy, but we’ve got a body search situation where we need all hands.”
Anything else you’d like to share about your experience? Ummm...just beware of the ginga-ninjas...they come out at night. If you start to smell gingerbread, RUN! Run as fast as you can!!
If your knitting has multiple colours, put it on a background with one of the lesser used colours – it will bring it to the foreground! If you look at our Peerie Flooers photos, the final photos are of the hat with a sweater of a similar texture and colour to the main body of the hat, and in front of a dark green hedge. Since the majority of the focal objects are in the same blue, the blue in the hat fades away a bit and makes the red stand out. The green in the background highlights the green accents in the hat as well; in these non-close-up shots, you are far less likely to notice the yellow in the hat. In the wip photos in front of the yellow and red autumn leaves however, the red and yellow colours in the hat really pop. Before you take your photos, always think about which colours you want to accentuate and plan accordingly.
Have a good day,
I only ask a few things:
On Monday, I started pulling everything out of the closets. And then I realized I was coming down with the flu. By Wednesday, three of us were in bed sick, and my house still looked like this:
Windsor Terrace.
And while there are thousands more known people who could be placed on the timeline, there must be many more unknown thousands who could never make themselves widely known because they did not have the communication skills, the technology, or the great desire to express their realization. If the Internet was around in the 20′s, 30′s, 40′s, and so on, there’d be thousands more confessors and expressers of nonduality. If we guys of the Internet era can hold our own when it comes to nonduality, it has certainly been true for the last hundred years in the West, and throughout the world in all nations and times.
Even after Ian Rodriguez left the Marine Corps in 2006, he still felt like he was in Iraq.
I think about blogging, but then I can’t think about anything to say and I get frustrated and put it aside.
We hope some of these will help you get even more from the site. Don’t forget if you need assistance you can always ask us directly. Google may not answer calls or emails but we do!
Administrative director of the Future Centre Trust, Nicole Garofano, saw the development cutting down on the island’s open spaces.
To explain what I meant.”
As discussed, The List by Joe Konrath isn't a book for me. Thank you, and I'm sorry. - Penguin Putnam
The suffering of animals, and sometimes humans, was always a part of ritual slaughter in ancient kingdoms throughout the word. The suffering of the animal is also vital for Muslims even if that suffering is indeed short. That’s what makes it the ritual that it is. If it were only the case of killing the animal, then stun-gun death would be acceptable to Muslims. But in that case there would be no suffering and the event would quite simply be too short. It is the timing of the neck-cutting which is important.
In the bible fishing is the metaphor for soul winning: boats are the churches and nets, the relationships.
Eddie Cicotte - Ex-Stars
Some who're far and some who're near.
The Story of Hollywood: An Illustrated History
Never mind! This is Norby (pictured) singing a Cuban love song.Norby was a guide for me during my visit.I visited her home & met her Family & she even introduced me to The Bishop Of Havana!
"We went over and stirred them (Indians) up and a lot of our fellows laid in at thehead of a gulch ... and they chased us down Corral Draw ... RileyMiller was a dead shot, and he just killed them Indians as fast as he could shoot ... We killed about seventy-five of them. Riley Miller and Frank Lockhart went back there and got some pack horses and brought out seven loads of guns, shirts, war bonnets, ghost shirts and things. Riley took 'em to Chicago and started a museum. He made a barrel of money out of it."
situation; be steadfast and unmovable in Him and declare with joy that all is
Please join me in snickering.
lauren: three bags full by leonie swann; an amusing and totally clever murder mystery in which the victim was an irish shepherd, and--i swear i'm not makin' this up-- the detectives are his *SHEEP*!
Come second pass,
And don’t forget to vote tomorrow.
Fubar is yet another, surprisingly, grindcore band which I haven't seen live but they sound very fun on this record. They are far much noisy and raw when compared to Lycanthrophy but it's still great fun. The bass on their side is actually so loud I can hardly recognize the guitar. Which is great because it kinda reminds me of a more organized Godstomper.
I’m wearing a pale, peachy-pink colored lipstick on my lips with some pink gloss over it.
Serves about 6. Serve with cous cous or rice.
GALLAGHER AND SHEAN
You can see all the bits and pieces they collected. The decorative stones also line the bottom of the container. They were from our wedding reception. I was glad to finally find a use for some of them!
My feet began to slap the ground, as I shook the thoughts from my head. Searching. Searching for my wife, my son. My child, my love. My heart, and my soul, through the fire.
"Just a little longer," I cooed.
This type of art is more difficult to commercialize because its benefits are less obvious to the distanced consumer. It's very difficult to keep one's distance when they're being raped, though modern culture is trying its best to achieve this.
April 20 – Detroit – The Works
And that's me. As if you hadn't figured that out.
“It happened very quickly, and to this day it troubles me,” said Buford, the school’s wrestling champion, who said he joined Romney in restraining Lauber. Buford subsequently apologized to Lauber, who was “terrified,” he said. “What a senseless, stupid, idiotic thing to do.”
I’ll end with one for anyone who cares.
A bit like the above fixture, this one appears that to have shifted in superiority, it seems it is now Drogheda that have the upper hand in this derby fixture. Drogheda deservedly beat Cork the last day, while Dundalk are still winless this season. They say form goes out the window in these games.
The recipe Martha Stewart's guest had was for Meyer Lemons and they don't seem to be in season down here right now (they are known as Valley Lemons in the Rio Grande Valley). So, I found another recipe - quite similar - to make.
Price: $6.15 bottle
o OSHA
(Still stuck on that Spoon song. Been in my head for days.)
Understandably, the first segment of the poem offers the most horrific concepts and it grows less so from there. But the time spent in hell is truly what horror is all about, and so I'm including L'inferno here for your consideration, as it is concerned only with the Inferno cantos of "The Divine Comedy". In recent times, this movie has been restored and released on DVD, complete with a controversial new soundtrack composed by Tangerine Dream. (More info here)
A ‘Flight Over Ancient Shipwrecks’
while the rest of us went swimming through Hezekiah's Tunnel.
He knew that his body was a temple of the Holy Spirit and he had to have it in good condition to withstand all the punishment and work that he would encounter along the way. If you are a believer, you also are to take care of that body of yours as God’s temple so that He can use you as He did the apostle Paul.
Emily-Jane came home with some jewellery and some nail varnishes of Auntie Debbie’s and she wanted to paint my fingers and my toes tonight, which I let her do.
A rotten twig upon so high a tree,
Simply put: in every way possible. Example: I was reviewing an alphabet book with my son Beckett this afternoon on the couch (see below for the story as read by someone on YouTube). The very first letter, A for Aardvark Admiring, brought on the first question: “Mommy, what’s an aardvark?” I had no idea how to explain an aardvark. My solution? I pulled out my iPhone, typed in “aardvark” to google and clicked on the wikipedia entry. There was enough information in that entry — an entry created by who knows how many users from across the globe — that I could comfortably explain enough about an aardvark to satiate my three-year-old’s curiosity, except that he wanted to see more pictures. Back to google, this time to search google images for aardvarks. Back to the book … until G gophers grinning … and google … wikipedia … google images. Then, J jackals jumping … repeat … and Q quails quacking … do quails quack? what does a quail look like? do they all have that funny feather?
I picked up a wiring harness and dash adapter at Autozone then went to work. Pulling the old radio was a piece of cake, but getting the new one to line up right with the dash was a PITA. The adapter faceplate opening was about 1/4" too small so I had to bust out the Dremel and an X-acto knife to trim it up.
The nation's policies are controlled by the most environmentally insane administration in its history, wasting billions on so-called green energy. Its new budget raises taxes and proposes a trillion-dollar deficit without any significant effort to cut the spending that has left this and future generations in debt while the price of gas soars to new heights.By Alan's standards, I'd say Nixon's was the most "environmentally insane administration," since the EPA didn't even exist until he came along. Still, the fact that natural gas and oil are finite resources, but Alan loathes the very notion of "renewable energy" makes me think his column is really addressing a larger issue. Why is he so determined to stop policies that might prevent, or at least mitigate, catastrophic global climate change? Well, he's 75 years old next October, and I think he looked in the mirror one day, accepted the inevitable fact of his own mortality, and decided that if he had to go, he was taking the Earth down with him!
But, I will try to share a lot of my ‘fake-meat’ recipes that I’ve used over the years over the next month. Typically, I don’t prepare or eat a lot of ‘fake-meat’ as I have never met a vegetable I didn’t like; there’s an endless variety of foods and recipes that a vegetarian can eat and prepare without having to eat things like tofu and tempeh. But, now and then I do get a hankering for some bacon to go with a big, juicy tomato on a BLT, or a Reuben sandwich, or just something a bit more substantial in my soup or stew pot than just veggies.
I know this because I am back in Upstate New York.
As a trans female having to deal with life and society, I found that what I represent, and my personal position in life, my inner feelings plays such an important role in achieving a well balance existence. All of us have so much to deal with in life. Take this in: You are inherently worthy. Before you ever do, achieve, or acquire, you are worthy. In other words, you are born worthy. This is a profound and powerful place to live from. How many of us really believe we are worthy?
When I realized my careless mistake (by reversing the order of an airport transfer, told here) my reaction was to ring a driver mate. I asked him to check on the arrival time of the flight from Toronto, hoping that it was an hour late.
Lolly Underwear: Alicia Z
Also finished DEVOURED, a dark, modern take on Snow White. The whole heart eating thing was a little creepy, but it was a fun read.
I told myself. Just wait.
EXT - Extended bloom as long as 16 hours sometimes (Yes or No)
to gain some new wisdom
I want to make a Lizardman stunty Blood Bowl team. Usually accepted as the '4th stunty team', Lizardmen can field a legal stunty team if they take no Saurus players: A Kroxigor & Skinks only.
You'll need:
I've been so excited about showing western that I packed away all my hunt seat stuff... I pitched my tall boots (they needed to be put to sleep anyway) and didn't plan on taking any of that stuff out until next year, assuming I still felt like showing hunt seat. I'm thinking now that perhaps I was a bit too hasty. I've been looking over a few show bills and I think we'll be fine doing hunt seat and western classes. Originally I was thinking it would be too much, but I think we can make it work.
We are ruled by brief encounters,
Jesus smiles at her and says, “Then neither do I condemn you, go now and leave your life of sin.”
Not content to have a successful career, she is also an outspoken activist. She is best known for her work for animal rights, working closely with PETA and mounting campaigns to retire elderly animals from their public careers (in circuses and the like). She is an outspoken vegetarian, appearing in this all-lettuce dress. An honest woman who is proud of her body and her age, she also advocates for respect for the elderly and fights ageism by proving you can look great and be happy and still look your age. She interviewed with InTouch magazine in 2009 about living healthy and naturally, including admitting to one brief, unhappy flirtation with Botox. Asked if she’d ever do it again, she replied
Tuesday, Keltie had her eye exam at BCH and their ophthalmology team agreed with the doctor that it was Stage 3, but she was “pre-plus disease” which means that she is not in need of surgery at this point. They took some amazing pictures of her eyes and showed both Chris and I what ROP looked like, etc… Colton had his swallow study that afternoon and it showed that he was aspirating on regular breast milk thickness and nectar thickness, but that he was safe for the most part on honey thick feeds. So the plan was for me to return Wednesday morning and feed him on the thickened feeds (and you can’t safely thicken breast milk until they are 44 weeks old, so he is now on all formula feeds thickened with rice cereal) with the Feeding Team watching to determine how long he could handle the thickened feeds. The concern was him burning too many calories trying to suck the thick feeds and tiring out, so they prepared us that he may only be able to take 10mLs of his feed (full feeds are 60-70mLs). Little did they know my son…
Michelle :-)
He looked down, hesitated to look up but did. He saw Ann turn the corner at the bottom of the stairs. She stopped, looked at him, looked at Donna, looked up the stairs, then looked at Donna again, then looked at him again.
6.) Do you choose to see the best or the worst in people? Why?
emme grace is our busy worker bee. rayley beth...not so much:)
This is the best way I think of to describe pinterest.
Could be doing better in spanish. :/ Made a D on the first biolgoy test.. not that good ... Made a C on the 2nd one which was better and i am happy about! :-) Got the wisdom teeth out.. It was a lot of
- She has had to write seven favourable reviews this year for authors with close connections to the publication.
Teach your heart to rejoice, no matter what the circumstances are. Cultivate that in your life. Determine that praise is going to be your response to whatever life throws at you!
How about your degree and variety of body movement?
Jon is friends with Gareth. That should give you some idea. Like Gareth, he is one of the cleverest people I know. He’s mercifully easier to please than Gareth, which means that the protracted arguments about the relative merits of New Who didn’t happen with him; instead, back in the days where we spent a lot of time together, we’d go and see bad films and try and work out whether he enjoyed Hollow Man more than I did because of all the Pro Plus he’d taken that evening or because it’s better than I’ll give it credit for. Those Friday evening sessions were glorious: I’d knock off my dead-end admin job at quarter to six, do a little shopping and meet Jon and his wife Holly (and, quite frequently, our other friend Douglas) at the local Warner Village for popcorn and Sprite, and then head back to casa del Skeet for pasta and late night sessions of Die Siedler von Catan, which he would invariably win. If we were working on a show, we’d brainstorm. I was very good at finding songs. Jon was great at staging them. Between us (and with a lot of help from Holly) we did great things and made a lot of people happy but it was always done out of love of simply doing it, and I think that’s what kept me from losing interest.
So, they figured, what the hell – let’s attack the injured party.
The other thing, which becomes clear straight away is that we've had similar small epidemics, always in closely knit communities. Dr. Ramsay also described the phenomenon that a few weeks after the initial outbreak there was another one, this time a lot smaller, and this continued for about 5 to 6 month after the initial one.
Its time for Mother’s Day and, as always, there is a lot happening at nilgiri’s.
Paul Gillespie - Chicago Cubs
All of this means that the pain of prostitution extends far beyond and long after the physical experience of prostitution itself. This is not pain with a conclusion; this is pain with a series of phases, and the physical lived reality of prostitution is only the first one.
And they always reply with “you’re right. Let us correct that and get the corrected statement out to you immediately.” (And just so you don't think this is an RH love fest, other houses have done similar but I've had to ask for the rec to print; however, if an error was found, they've corrected it.)
Everyday brings a brand new start,
Eating lentils on New Year's Eve ensures that the next year will be full of money, lentils representing riches. Of course every second uncle will lament that he has consumed lentils by the bucketful and failed to increase his bank account. But lentils will always be on the menu. Growing up in Australia I don't remember any tradition other than the campfire down on the rocks by the lake, and the lazy beer-soaked hours ticking by until fireworks sprouted up miles away on the coast. One by one we would trail off to bed.
REDCHAIR; Sports Editor
Add a tsp oil and fry coriander seeds and curry leaves, until the leaves become crisp. Keep aside.
As the girls and guys walked down the aisle I could sense my future husband being nervous (he later told me he got nervous when he knew I was coming next). I walked down the aisle with my father to John Lennon’s “LOVE” After the I do’s were said and the rings exchanged we walked out as husband and wife to The Beatles’ “I love her” .
You see, we have simply glossed over the context of 1 Timothy 6:10. We can easily quote the first part of that passage, yet, couldn’t begin to recite the second half.
Creative Artists Agency Co-Founder, Roland Perkins, discussing his days in the mail room at the William Morris Agency in 1959:
Bring the milk and cream to the boil. Add the popcorn and simmer for about 5-10 minutes to infuse the milk-cream-mixture. Let stand to cool, strain with a sieve and chill the mixture in the fridge. Place in the ice cream maker for about 10-15 minutes or according to instructions for your machine.
The rules of this award:
Damn near anything will taste good after walking it out in NO for an hour. All the beer sold on the street are Miller and Bud lights, but it does the trick. I look forward to going back to NO in the winter for some winter seasonals to see how these guys get 'er done when it's time to turn it up.
I will be pinning featured recipes.
*RINO= Republican In Name Only. (They refer to libertarians and liberals.)
Just when we thought we couldn’t last another day of fighting, and we just wanted to “cruise” through life a little, God decides it’s time to peel off another layer to go deeper and those aforementioned tornadoes arrived…
Across the past 5 years, Darren Fletcher has been one of the best midfield players in the English Premier League and, prior to the diagnosis of his illness, arguably amongst the most influential in the world as part of Manchester United’s glorious league and European teams.
27. Watermelon In Easter Hay (5:43)
Two teenage girls in Johannesburg were doused with petrol and set alight in a satanic ritual. The provincial police spokesman reported that the girls were tied up by their friends and burned in what appeared to be a satanic ritual. The Star quoted from Izabella Little, of the Teenage Advice Forum, Life Talk, that: "Satanism is not spoken about very often". She mentioned an incident in Cape Town where a mother reported her teenage daughter kidnapped and taken to some satanic church where another teenager was murdered. She managed to escape but was very traumatized. Police investigated the incident, but it was never mentioned in the media. "We always hear rumours about Satanism, but it is not something people are talking about. We would like them to come forward so that this can come into the open."
Funnily in every dream I end up winning :P
5. Rich Man’s War- Steve Earle
Speaking of digital, Mr. Griepp said that digital comics are “the fastest-growing part of the comics business”. He said that the market has expanded from $500,000 in 2009 to an estimated $6 million to $8 million in 2010. That is an increase of over ten times.
I don’t want to give anything away, but there’s a subplot that pops up about half way through the book that I thought was a wonderful addition to the main plot. It added another layer to Emma and really helped her character to grow. And that’s what’s really at the heart of this story: growing. I think it’s great that Emma comes back all ready to take over her life again. But is that really the life she wants? And if so, will that life still be there for her? It’s these questions, and the way that Catherine approaches them, that makes this such a great read.
Reports have also come out that authorities have prepared “standby shelters” for residents should the “need” arise to evacuate the downtown area. That news came from a leaked directive to the American Red Cross. In addition a leaked Red Cross email says that the summit could “create unrest or another national security incident.” The stand-by shelters are located in Wisconsin. This email was leaked to CBS News.
“You want to hypnotize me into having aquaphobia?”
* Yeeeeaaah, it might just be me. But I am pretty good at this game, honest.
The Black Pirate’s pirates stand out, having visited a costume shop prior to shooting and bedecked themselves in trademark pirate-wear, including eye-patches, peg legs and parrots. The first ship this barnacled lot attacks includes Fairbanks among its passengers, along with his father. The two men are the only survivors of the pirate’s pillage, though dad doesn’t live long. This causes Fairbanks (as yet unnamed in the film) to vow vengeance upon the murderers. But he’ll do it his way.
I've been preoccupied and haven't done much on the table top gaming front lately.
“Since the blockade was enforced, we have 3,000 tankers stranded across Pakistan.”
Don’t get caught off guard! Make sure you keep your eye out for these events so you know what’s happening at the Magic Kingdom on the day of your visit.
Somehow, I doubt that an investigation of the DPD conducted by people who would fit Catotti’s specifications—basically Sgt. Mark Gottlieb and the Group of 88—would have much credibility.
He denied any sexual relationship with the 13-year-old or sexually assaulting her sister.
HMUA: Joyce Paa
Prime lenses are really helpful for presetting what is called the hyperfocal distance. If you are shooting a lot of action that even autofocus cannot keep up with, using the guide with Aperture Priority (or Manual) can help. Set the f/stop, set the infinity symbol at one end of the f/stop range and then read off the corresponding value on the other f/stop mark. Without having to refocus, you can constantly shoot as long as your subject is between the range. For example, using my 50mm AF Nikkor at f/16 and locking in Aperture Priority, everything from about 10 feet to infinity will be within a reasonable focus.
As a trader first, and a teacher second, I can tell you that this is terrible advice. Yes, a demo account is good to get used to the mechanics of entering orders, checking that software is configured correctly, etc. BUT, simulator accounts completely ignore the mental and emotional impact of losing or gaining hundreds or thousands of dollars during the day. And usually the mental part is what kills trading accounts, not necessarily the trading method (although most “secret” methods will eventually lead you to ruin, too – most methods are that bad).
Everyone knows traffic is a problem, and the DEIS identifies significant adverse impacts at numerous intersections analyzed. The mitigation measures would include increased subway service, onsite bicycle parking, and a reconfiguration of the main intersection.
probably came from my mother, who was Irish. She was always
On return, both of them bragged how they had been feted by the campaign managers of the contending parties before they were herded towards the polling booth. While comparing notes, it came to light that while one was fed with four puris, two jalebis and curd, the other had been treated only to austere litti and chokha combo (staple Bihari food). The latter rued his lot and lamented that had he known about the menu in the opposite camp before hand, he would have switched his loyalty to the right person at the right hour.
A candle,
Each one you do you can post again for a chance to win!
Top 4 Tips to Keep Cool Indoors
It was just another Sunday morning in Windsor Terrace and there we were as usual using the PS 130 schoolyard as our practice court for roller hockey. I know we used to annoy the poor people that owned the house right behind the schoolyard too. Many a hockey puck deflected off my goalie stick and hit the side of their house, including their windows. I guess the couple that lived there weren’t big hockey fans, they always kept our pucks and cursed at us too. And on a Sunday morning no less, what nerve!
According to Paice, the reasonable royalty may have been acceptable for "regular" infringement, but it is not appropriate for ongoing, post-verdict, infringement. Since the district court's royalty is tantamount to a compulsory license, Paice argues that such a remedy is contrary to judicial precedence and 35 U.S.C. § 283. Also, Paice argues that since a compulsory license relates to damages, Paice is entitled to a jury trial under the 7th Amendment to determine the appropriate number for future damages:
Andrea Pearson
I surrender all
Mr Walker was one of several British National Party activists who turned up to hand in the letter. After the letter was delivered, a heavy police presence of more than a dozen officers descended on the car park outside of the building.
If I’ve completely confused you, take a look at the photos and it will probably help. Clear instructions aren’t my strongest point…
We’re sipping raspberry martinis and nibbling on white chocolate truffles to celebrate the latest release from Siren Author Nicole Morgan. Welcome Nicole!
EP2: Yoochun~!!!
13. What if we decide to unschool and it ruins our kids' lives?
The lake was indeed beautiful and I reached it easily -- though I had to stick to the map and color coded trees like gum. Some parts were flat and easy to navigate (old roads) but others I would have never known were trails if they hadn't been marked. This was not a place I wanted to Get Lost -- I just wanted the challenge of getting to the lake.
No one can see our
The Kid Mohair had marinated in my stash for quite while I remained uninspired. Then I bought some nice pink Jade Sapphire cashmere to make a pair of mittens, and I just knew the mittens would be perfect if I knitted them using a strand of the cashmere and a strand of the mohair. Nice, soft, fuzzy mittens resulted. But I still had over 2.5 balls of Kid Mohair stashed away. It was time to wait for more inspiration.
The first cane stroke or two were normal. Painful, scary, but not too bad. The truth is, for some reason, ever since we moved in together, the cane had not been hurting like it had in the past, So I wasn't as horrified as I possibly should have been.
The dulcet tones of Sting waft through the car.
I panicked at the thought and pleaded with the Lord that that was such a small number if He meant those who will escape. Praise God, as I prayed later that day, He made clear that those are the ones who will respond to His call to pour out His grace, to sound the alarm, to call for those who are asleep. That was the number of men and women who will arise to speak up before that dreadful day comes upon the land, to bring as many people as possible out to safety in His arms. The word of the Lord on March 28 which says, “They will arise whom the Lord has chosen,” has become more relevant with this assurance. Truly, the Lord is gracious and compassionate, slow to anger and rich in love (Psalm 145:8 NIV). He is yet extending His arms in mercy to embrace those who will listen and come to Him in humble repentance. He prefers to save than punish; prefers to give life than death. But the grace period is ending very soon… please heed.
The last interesting thing of the day, I spotted the ghost of Byron Lakes here today. We have this weird ghost that only appears on windy days.
The very nature of surveillance technologies used by national security and law enforcement agencies is privacy intrusive. However, cautionary voices have been raised in an attempt to slow down what is perceived as unrestricted and unnecessary violations of civil liberties and privacy rights in the name of enhanced national security. But how much is too much? Before taking this class on Insecurity and Counter-law, I have never questioned this. This class has really taught me to think outside the box in a way and not to be quite so naive. As citizens we trust and empower the government to make important decisions on our behalf for our welfare. Many people do not consider their rights and other liberties as being infringed when it’s by the government. I used to be one of them and thought that the government has the right over us, to question us, as long as it is for the welfare of the nation. But now that I think more deeply about it on a personal level, they should not have the right to violate my civil liberties without legitimate reasons. Privacy is a fundamental human right and must be protected as such.
-TNA World Tag Team Champions Motorcity Machine Guns
I had a great mothers day. I met with some other Mom friends and families at the beach for a cookout and lots of running around for the kids. The dads and kids handled most of the cooking and cleaning up and it was a blessing.
McCartney had not been to Apple headquarters since before Christmas, but ‘he communicates by telephone,’ the spokesman said.’’
And don’t forget about the Friday evening meal before the game. It usually consist of a quick hamburger, and really quick because you’re cooking, getting dressed, braiding hair, getting suits together, and trying to get the family ready to go. Then you remember that you forgot to pick up the uniform at the cleaners and if you hurry you’ll get there before it closes.
Geese sometimes get a bad rap. They have a reputation for being mean. They can be, but usually it’s during the mating season and they are protecting their turf, their nests, and their eggs. Most of the time, they are pretty easy to get along with.
We used all Ethan Allen furniture....
Why should a dog, a horse, a rat, have life,
I’ve got 50 eccentric, fascinating grad students this term.
While some Hougang residents have been exerting pressure on Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong to call for a by-election soon, others felt that public resources should not be wasted to help WP clear up its own internal mess.
But when he came back in, I knew by the look on his face that Wass found him.
This was the third long weekend I've spent in the company of Tokyo-based directors Yoshihiro Nishimura and Noboru Iguchi.
Regarding racism, I just looked at the online version Encyclopedia of Social Work. My simple search for “racism” didn’t turn up an entry on that topic. I thought you might have a specific reference you could point me toward, given that your definition seems to be an exception to general usage. I hope you’re not telling me that I have to read a book to understand your mark on my paper.
v) They can sit at home watching TV and still look gorgeous when we normal man are working our butts off in gym.
You tell the dog to Sit! as you make the hand motion for Sit! and as the dog sits, you click the clicker and immediately give him a treat. The instructor did not like me--that is, she didn't like Riley, and so by extension she did not like me. Riley was four months old when we got him and he was an unhappy, nervous, frightened dog. The instructor had a big German shepherd that she wanted to demonstrate on, but every time she took him out of his crate, Riley went ballistic with fear, and so she had to keep putting her dog back into his crate. She was not gracious about this.
Wiping his palms on his trousers just left ugly stains on the fabric and bits of fluff on his skin. He guessed the obnoxious treatment kept the torch from burning too quickly; closer inspection showed that there was no rag or straw at the top of the stick; it was the wood of the shaft itself that burned, far brighter and yet slower than a stick should. The whole arrangement suggested frightening new dimensions to the Second Realm danger ahead of him.
It is fragrance free and hypo-allergenic.
A new copyright web forum called Copygrounds has been launched by staff and students at the Department of Radio-Television-Film at the University of Texas. The first blog is a fascinating interview with Joel Tenenbaum, who became the poster boy for illegal filesharers around the world after being sued by the Recording Industry Association of America (see previous blogs here!).
The events of the Weimar endphase find a fainter, but nevertheless distinct echo in the United States in recent years. It is remarkable that one of the first public statements to be made by an administration official in the wake of passage of the MCA was a "warning" issued by Attorney General Alberto Gonzales to sitting federal judges. "A proper sense of judicial humility requires judges to keep in mind the institutional limitations of the judiciary and the duties expressly assigned by the Constitution to the more politically accountable branches," Gonzales stated to a gathering of judges. The inescapable message being sent was to warn judges from taking any step to interfere with Bush's policies addressing detainees in the war on terror, policies largely crafted under the supervision of Gonzales. But the provocative nature of Gonzales' remarks becomes apparent when we consider that these are the very policies which the Supreme Court determined to be unlawful in its opinion in Hamdan.
The attackers were still present when they arrived, but fled when shots were exchanged
We have three generous sponsors for this challenge: Stamp Shoppe Creations is offering one random winner a $15 gift certificate; Shelley's Images is giving a lucky random winner a $9 gift certificate; and Designed 2 Delight is giving a random winner a $10 voucher AND each of the Top Three a $5 voucher! That's right: our Top Three as voted on by our design team wins a sponsor prize this time from Designed 2 Delight as well as a Blog Badge for your blog and a guest design team opportunity in a future challenge!
I was quite curious to see what manner of local food delicacy I would get sent, since my parcel had come all the way from America. I've not had much opportunity to try much in the way of American sweets, having never visited the country myself, or really known anyone who has (or if they have, no-one who has been recently and brought me back chocolates!), so I was really excited when I opened the box to find this:
Korra went through some considerable growth in this episode, she is not used to feeling fear, and even though her sleeps are nightmare ridden, she suppresses the feelings and challenges Amon to a duel. She does what she knows how to do: fight. But in the end when Amon and his chi-blocking henchmen take her with ease she is finally willing to admit to Tenzen that she is frightened to her vary core of loosing her bending, and being beaten by the skilled Amon. This scene was also sweet because it showed how Tenzen really cares for Korra, it is nice to see that bond forming between teacher and student.
Process not product:
Six years ago, "sharing" was the innocent word for what we were doing. Quickly, the power to have an Internet audience led to corruption, self-inflated stardom, inane rationalization, and warped philosophies about why taking somebody else's property without permission was a good thing. With music blogs and forums, it became a bonfire of vanities, with everyone gleefully tossing whole albums in FLAC out there, entire discographies, and even demands for Paypal donations and urgings to download so that the "hard work" could get rewarded with Rapidshare points, Megaupload money pay-outs, etc. etc.
Stop. Think. Choose…. so make it easy on yourself — and do the free stuff now so you won’t pay for it later.
The basic elements of a claim of slander include;
National Readers Choice Award Finalist
1. Kentucky Wildcats
I used to think that with other relationships, but with Will- I am happiest with him, so "me" time would make me feel incomplete.
the challenges will be met,
John Coltrane (ts)
I have been adjusting to Celiac disease (gluten allergy) for almost 2 years now. Thank goodness I can cook! There are so many products available, and with a little searching I am enjoying most of my favorite foods. The two big exceptions are sandwich bread and biscuits. If anyone out there has ever tried gluten free bread, you will appreciate this:
- Flavor Oils or Essential Oils may be added at about 1% off your formula. Be sure to use essential oils that are not photosensitive and flavor oils that are oil-based and intended for use in lip balms (not food flavorings that are alcohol-based!). Too much flavor oil can prevent your balms from solidifying properly and give a bitter aftertaste to lip balm.
And with the scene being as active and vibrant as it is, there will almost certainly be special one-off shows that crop up along the way.
Eventually, we have a collection of strategies for dealing with fearful situations. My strategies were hide, freeze, or acquiesce. These were the things that worked, that minimized or shortened my suffering and pain.
I say alternative because the anime ending created a more romantic, very non-shonen like, ending but it can be argued that this ending can still be in the RK canon because it happened right after a filler story line and it was very vague as to when it happened.
The main thing for Malaysians after the watershed 2008 12th General Election is for the nation not to regress into being a BN-dominant system. If that happens in the coming 13th General Election then the rakyat will have only themselves, to blame for wrecking the foundation of change, which they have so labouriously laid in 2008.
four directions; one feminine side
Homemade hummus is fantastic, as it can double as both an after school snack AND lunchbox standby. This version couldn't be easier or cheaper, as it omits the tahini and comes together quickly.
- I say: That baby head looks like it’s made out of chocolate. Mmm, chocolate….
